Florida, session 2026, SB1662.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 183 184 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 185 16.71, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 186 16.71âFlorida Gaming Control Commission; creation; 187 meetings; membership.â 188 (2)âMEMBERSHIP.â 189 (a)âThe commission shall consist of five members appointed 190 by the Governor, and subject to confirmation by the Senate, for 191 terms of 4 years. Members of the commission must be appointed by 192 January 1, 2022. The Governor shall consider appointees who 193 reflect Floridaâs racial, ethnic, and gender diversity. Of the 194 initial five members appointed by the Governor, and immediately 195 upon appointment, the Governor shall appoint one of the members 196 as the initial chair and one of the members as the initial vice 197 chair. At the end of the initial chairâs and vice chairâs terms 198 pursuant to subparagraph 1., the commission shall elect one of 199 the members of the commission as chair and one of the members of 200 the commission as vice chair. 201 1.âFor the purpose of providing staggered terms, of the 202 initial appointments, two members shall be appointed to 4-year 203 terms, two members shall be appointed to 3-year terms, and one 204 member shall be appointed to a 2-year term. 205 2.âOf the five members, at least one member must have at 206 least 10 years of experience in law enforcement and criminal 207 investigations, at least one member must be a certified public 208 accountant licensed in this state with at least 10 years of 209 experience in accounting and auditing, and at least one member 210 must be an attorney admitted and authorized to practice law in 211 this state for at least the preceding 10 years. 212 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 17.11, Florida 213 Statutes, is amended to read: 214 17.11âTo report disbursements made.â 215 (2)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall also cause to have 216 reported from the Florida Accounting Information Resource 217 Subsystem no less than quarterly the disbursements which 218 agencies made to small businesses, as defined in s. 288.703 the 219 Florida Small and Minority Business Assistance Act; to certified 220 minority business enterprises in the aggregate; and to certified 221 minority business enterprises broken down into categories of 222 minority persons, as well as gender and nationality subgroups. 223 This information must shall be made available to the agencies, 224 the Office of Supplier Development Diversity, the Governor, the 225 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 226 Representatives. Each agency is shall be responsible for the 227 accuracy of information entered into the Florida Accounting 228 Information Resource Subsystem for use in this reporting. 229 Section 3.âSection 24.113, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 230 Section 4.âSection 110.112, Florida Statutes, is amended to 231 read: 232 110.112âAffirmative action; Equal employment opportunity.â 233 (1)âIt is the policy of the this state to provide equal 234 opportunities in employment. Discrimination in employment 235 because of race, gender, creed, color, or national origin is 236 prohibited. Executive agencies may not use racial or gender set 237 asides, preferences, or quotas when making decisions regarding 238 the hiring, retention, or promotion of a state employee assist 239 in providing the assurance of equal employment opportunity 240 through programs of affirmative and positive action that will 241 allow full utilization of women, minorities, and individuals who 242 have a disability. 243 (2)(a)âThe head of each executive agency shall develop and 244 implement an affirmative action plan in accordance with rules 245 adopted by the department and approved by a majority vote of the 246 Administration Commission before their adoption. 247 (b)âEach executive agency shall establish annual goals for 248 ensuring full utilization of groups underrepresented in the 249 agencyâs workforce, including women, minorities, and individuals 250 who have a disability, as compared to the relevant labor market, 251 as defined by the agency. Each executive agency shall design its 252 affirmative action plan to meet its established goals. 253 (c)âEach executive agency shall annually report to the 254 department regarding the agencyâs progress toward increasing 255 employment among women, minorities, and individuals who have a 256 disability. 257 (d)âAn affirmative action-equal employment opportunity 258 officer shall be appointed by the head of each executive agency. 259 The affirmative action-equal employment opportunity officerâs 260 responsibilities must include determining annual goals, 261 monitoring agency compliance, and providing consultation to 262 managers regarding progress, deficiencies, and appropriate 263 corrective action. 264 (e)âThe department shall report information in its annual 265 workforce report relating to the implementation, continuance, 266 updating, and results of each executive agencyâs affirmative 267 action plan for the previous fiscal year. The annual workforce 268 report must also include data for each executive agency relating 269 to employment levels among women, minorities, and individuals 270 who have a disability. 271 (f)âThe department shall provide to all supervisory 272 personnel of the executive agencies training in the principles 273 of equal employment opportunity and affirmative action, the 274 development and implementation of affirmative action plans, and 275 the establishment of annual affirmative action goals. The 276 department may contract for training services, and each 277 participating agency shall reimburse the department for costs 278 incurred through such contract. After the department approves 279 the contents of the training program for the agencies, the 280 department may delegate this training to the executive agencies. 281 (3)(a)âThe department, in consultation with the Agency for 282 Persons with Disabilities, the Division of Vocational 283 Rehabilitation and the Division of Blind Services of the 284 Department of Education, the Department of Commerce, and the 285 Executive Office of the Governor, shall develop and implement 286 programs that incorporate internships, mentoring, on-the-job 287 training, unpaid work experience, situational assessments, and 288 other innovative strategies that are specifically geared toward 289 individuals who have a disability. 290 (b)âBy January 1, 2017, the department shall develop 291 mandatory training programs for human resources personnel and 292 hiring managers of executive agencies which support the 293 employment of individuals who have a disability. 294 (c)1.âBy January 1, 2017, each executive agency shall 295 develop an agency-specific plan that addresses how to promote 296 employment opportunities for individuals who have a disability. 297 2.âThe department shall assist executive agencies in the 298 implementation of agency-specific plans. The department shall 299 regularly report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 300 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives the progress of 301 executive agencies in implementing these plans. Such reports 302 must shall be made at least biannually. 303 (d)âThe department shall compile data regarding the hiring 304 practices of executive agencies with regard to individuals who 305 have a disability and make such data available on its website. 306 (e)âThe department shall assist executive agencies in 307 identifying and implementing strategies for retaining employees 308 who have a disability which include, but are not limited to, 309 training programs, funding reasonable accommodations, increasing 310 access to appropriate technologies, and ensuring accessibility 311 of physical and virtual workplaces. 312 (f)âThe department shall adopt rules relating to forms that 313 provide for the voluntary self-identification of individuals who 314 have a disability and are employed by an executive agency. 315 (g)âThis subsection does not create any substantive or 316 procedural right or benefit enforceable at law or in equity 317 against the state or a state agency, or an officer, employee, or 318 agent thereof. 319 (4)âEach state attorney and public defender shall: 320 (a)âDevelop and implement an affirmative action plan. 321 (b)âEstablish annual goals for ensuring full utilization of 322 groups underrepresented in its workforce as compared to the 323 relevant labor market in this state. The state attorneysâ and 324 public defendersâ affirmative action plans must be designed to 325 meet the established goals. 326 (c)âAppoint an affirmative action-equal employment 327 opportunity officer. 328 (3)(5)âThe state, its agencies and officers shall ensure 329 freedom from discrimination in employment as provided by the 330 Florida Civil Rights Act of 1992, by s. 112.044, and by this 331 chapter. 332 (4)(6)âAny individual claiming to be aggrieved by an 333 unlawful employment practice may file a complaint with the 334 Florida Commission on Human Relations as provided by s. 760.11. 335 (5)(7)âThe department shall review and monitor executive 336 agency actions in carrying out the rules adopted by the 337 department pursuant to this section. 338 Section 5.âSubsection (4) of section 110.211, Florida 339 Statutes, is amended to read: 340 110.211âRecruitment.â 341 (4)âAll recruitment literature involving state position 342 vacancies must shall contain the phrase âAn Equal Opportunity 343 Employer/Affirmative Action Employer.â 344 Section 6.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 345 110.605, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 346 110.605âPowers and duties; personnel rules, records, 347 reports, and performance appraisal.â 348 (1)âThe department shall adopt and administer uniform 349 personnel rules, records, and reports relating to employees and 350 positions in the Selected Exempt Service, as well as any other 351 rules and procedures relating to personnel administration which 352 are necessary to carry out the purposes of this part. 353 (d)âThe department shall develop a program of affirmative 354 and positive actions that will ensure full utilization of women 355 and minorities in Selected Exempt Service positions. 356 Section 7.âSection 255.101, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 357 Section 8.âSection 255.102, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 358 Section 9.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 359 255.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 360 255.20âLocal bids and contracts for public construction 361 works; specification of state-produced lumber.â 362 (1)âA county, municipality, special district as defined in 363 chapter 189, or other political subdivision of the state seeking 364 to construct or improve a public building, structure, or other 365 public construction works must competitively award to an 366 appropriately licensed contractor each project that is estimated 367 to cost more than $300,000. For electrical work, the local 368 government must competitively award to an appropriately licensed 369 contractor each project that is estimated to cost more than 370 $75,000. As used in this section, the term âcompetitively awardâ 371 means to award contracts based on the submission of sealed bids, 372 proposals submitted in response to a request for proposal, 373 proposals submitted in response to a request for qualifications, 374 or proposals submitted for competitive negotiation. This 375 subsection expressly allows contracts for construction 376 management services, design/build contracts, continuation 377 contracts based on unit prices, and any other contract 378 arrangement with a private sector contractor permitted by any 379 applicable municipal or county ordinance, by district 380 resolution, or by state law. For purposes of this section, cost 381 includes employee compensation and benefits, except inmate 382 labor, the cost of equipment and maintenance, insurance costs, 383 and the cost of direct materials to be used in the construction 384 of the project, including materials purchased by the local 385 government, and other direct costs, plus a factor of 20 percent 386 for management, overhead, and other indirect costs. Subject to 387 the provisions of subsection (3), the county, municipality, 388 special district, or other political subdivision may establish, 389 by municipal or county ordinance or special district resolution, 390 procedures for conducting the bidding process. 391 (c)âThe provisions of This subsection does do not apply: 392 1.âIf the project is undertaken to replace, reconstruct, or 393 repair an existing public building, structure, or other public 394 construction works damaged or destroyed by a sudden unexpected 395 turn of events such as an act of God, riot, fire, flood, 396 accident, or other urgent circumstances, and such damage or 397 destruction creates: 398 a.âAn immediate danger to the public health or safety; 399 b.âOther loss to public or private property which requires 400 emergency government action; or 401 c.âAn interruption of an essential governmental service. 402 2.âIf, after notice by publication in accordance with the 403 applicable ordinance or resolution, the governmental entity does 404 not receive any responsive bids or proposals. 405 3.âTo construction, remodeling, repair, or improvement to a 406 public electric or gas utility system if such work on the public 407 utility system is performed by personnel of the system. 408 4.âTo construction, remodeling, repair, or improvement by a 409 utility commission whose major contracts are to construct and 410 operate a public electric utility system. 411 5.âIf the project is undertaken as repair or maintenance of 412 an existing public facility. For the purposes of this paragraph, 413 the term ârepairâ means a corrective action to restore an 414 existing public facility to a safe and functional condition and 415 the term âmaintenanceâ means a preventive or corrective action 416 to maintain an existing public facility in an operational state 417 or to preserve the facility from failure or decline. Repair or 418 maintenance includes activities that are necessarily incidental 419 to repairing or maintaining the facility. Repair or maintenance 420 does not include the construction of any new building, 421 structure, or other public construction works or any substantial 422 addition, extension, or upgrade to an existing public facility. 423 Such additions, extensions, or upgrades are shall be considered 424 substantial if the estimated cost of the additions, extensions, 425 or upgrades included as part of the repair or maintenance 426 project exceeds the threshold amount in subsection (1) and 427 exceeds 20 percent of the estimated total cost of the repair or 428 maintenance project fully accounting for all costs associated 429 with performing and completing the work, including employee 430 compensation and benefits, equipment cost and maintenance, 431 insurance costs, and the cost of direct materials to be used in 432 the construction of the project, including materials purchased 433 by the local government, and other direct costs, plus a factor 434 of 20 percent for management, overhead, and other indirect 435 costs. An addition, extension, or upgrade may shall not be 436 considered substantial if it is undertaken pursuant to the 437 conditions specified in subparagraph 1. Repair and maintenance 438 projects and any related additions, extensions, or upgrades may 439 not be divided into multiple projects for the purpose of evading 440 the requirements of this subparagraph. 441 6.âIf the project is undertaken exclusively as part of a 442 public educational program. 443 7.âIf the funding source of the project will be diminished 444 or lost because the time required to competitively award the 445 project after the funds become available exceeds the time within 446 which the funding source must be spent. 447 8.âIf the local government competitively awarded a project 448 to a private sector contractor and the contractor abandoned the 449 project before completion or the local government terminated the 450 contract. 451 9.âIf the governing board of the local government complies 452 with all of the requirements of this subparagraph, conducts a 453 public meeting under s. 286.011 after public notice, and finds 454 by majority vote of the governing board that it is in the 455 publicâs best interest to perform the project using its own 456 services, employees, and equipment. The public notice must be 457 published at least 21 days before the date of the public meeting 458 at which the governing board takes final action. The notice must 459 identify the project, the components and scope of the work, and 460 the estimated cost of the project fully accounting for all costs 461 associated with performing and completing the work, including 462 employee compensation and benefits, equipment cost and 463 maintenance, insurance costs, and the cost of direct materials 464 to be used in the construction of the project, including 465 materials purchased by the local government, and other direct 466 costs, plus a factor of 20 percent for management, overhead, and 467 other indirect costs. The notice must specify that the purpose 468 for the public meeting is to consider whether it is in the 469 publicâs best interest to perform the project using the local 470 governmentâs own services, employees, and equipment. Upon 471 publication of the public notice and for 21 days thereafter, the 472 local government shall make available for public inspection, 473 during normal business hours and at a location specified in the 474 public notice, a detailed itemization of each component of the 475 estimated cost of the project and documentation explaining the 476 methodology used to arrive at the estimated cost. At the public 477 meeting, any qualified contractor or vendor who could have been 478 awarded the project had the project been competitively bid must 479 shall be provided with a reasonable opportunity to present 480 evidence to the governing board regarding the project and the 481 accuracy of the local governmentâs estimated cost of the 482 project. In deciding whether it is in the publicâs best interest 483 for the local government to perform a project using its own 484 services, employees, and equipment, the governing board shall 485 must consider the estimated cost of the project fully accounting 486 for all costs associated with performing and completing the 487 work, including employee compensation and benefits, equipment 488 cost and maintenance, insurance costs, and the cost of direct 489 materials to be used in the construction of the project, 490 including materials purchased by the local government, and other 491 direct costs, plus a factor of 20 percent for management, 492 overhead, and other indirect costs, and the accuracy of the 493 estimated cost in light of any other information that may be 494 presented at the public meeting and whether the project requires 495 an increase in the number of government employees or an increase 496 in capital expenditures for public facilities, equipment, or 497 other capital assets. The local government may further consider 498 the impact on local economic development, the impact on small 499 and minority business owners, the impact on state and local tax 500 revenues, whether the private sector contractors provide health 501 insurance and other benefits equivalent to those provided by the 502 local government, and any other factor relevant to what is in 503 the publicâs best interest. A report summarizing completed 504 projects constructed by the local government pursuant to this 505 subsection must shall be publicly reviewed each year by the 506 governing body of the local government. The report must shall 507 detail the estimated costs and the actual costs of the projects 508 constructed by the local government pursuant to this subsection. 509 The report must shall be made available for review by the 510 public. The Auditor General shall review the report as part of 511 his or her audits of local governments. 512 10.âIf the governing board of the local government 513 determines upon consideration of specific substantive criteria 514 that it is in the best interest of the local government to award 515 the project to an appropriately licensed private sector 516 contractor pursuant to administrative procedures established by 517 and expressly set forth in a charter, an ordinance, or a 518 resolution of the local government adopted before July 1, 1994. 519 The criteria and procedures must be set out in the charter, 520 ordinance, or resolution and must be applied uniformly by the 521 local government to avoid awarding a project in an arbitrary or 522 capricious manner. This exception applies only if all of the 523 following occur: 524 a.âThe governing board of the local government, after 525 public notice, conducts a public meeting under s. 286.011 and 526 finds by a two-thirds vote of the governing board that it is in 527 the publicâs best interest to award the project according to the 528 criteria and procedures established by charter, ordinance, or 529 resolution. The public notice must be published at least 14 days 530 before the date of the public meeting at which the governing 531 board takes final action. The notice must identify the project, 532 the estimated cost of the project, and specify that the purpose 533 for the public meeting is to consider whether it is in the 534 publicâs best interest to award the project using the criteria 535 and procedures permitted by the preexisting charter, ordinance, 536 or resolution. 537 b.âThe project is to be awarded by any method other than a 538 competitive selection process, and the governing board finds 539 evidence that: 540 (I)âThere is one appropriately licensed contractor who is 541 uniquely qualified to undertake the project because that 542 contractor is currently under contract to perform work that is 543 affiliated with the project; or 544 (II)âThe time to competitively award the project will 545 jeopardize the funding for the project, materially increase the 546 cost of the project, or create an undue hardship on the public 547 health, safety, or welfare. 548 c.âThe project is to be awarded by any method other than a 549 competitive selection process, and the published notice clearly 550 specifies the ordinance or resolution by which the private 551 sector contractor will be selected and the criteria to be 552 considered. 553 d.âThe project is to be awarded by a method other than a 554 competitive selection process, and the architect or engineer of 555 record has provided a written recommendation that the project be 556 awarded to the private sector contractor without competitive 557 selection, and the consideration by, and the justification of, 558 the government body are documented, in writing, in the project 559 file and are presented to the governing board prior to the 560 approval required in this paragraph. 561 11.âTo projects subject to chapter 336. 562 Section 10.âSubsections (18) and (19) of section 287.012, 563 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 564 287.012âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 565 (18)ââMinority business enterpriseâ has the same meaning as 566 provided in s. 288.703. 567 (19)ââOfficeâ means the Office of Supplier Development 568 Diversity of the Department of Management Services. 569 Section 11.âParagraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (2) and 570 paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (3) of section 287.042, 571 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 572 287.042âPowers, duties, and functions.âThe department shall 573 have the following powers, duties, and functions: 574 (2)(a)âTo establish purchasing agreements and procure state 575 term contracts for commodities and contractual services, 576 pursuant to s. 287.057, under which state agencies shall, and 577 eligible users may, make purchases pursuant to s. 287.056. The 578 department may restrict purchases from some term contracts to 579 state agencies only for those term contracts where the inclusion 580 of other governmental entities will have an adverse effect on 581 competition or to those federal facilities located in this 582 state. In such planning or purchasing the Office of Supplier 583 Diversity may monitor to ensure that opportunities are afforded 584 for contracting with minority business enterprises. The 585 department, for state term contracts, and all agencies, for 586 multiyear contractual services or term contracts, shall explore 587 reasonable and economical means to utilize certified minority 588 business enterprises. Purchases by any county, municipality, 589 private nonprofit community transportation coordinator 590 designated pursuant to chapter 427, while conducting business 591 related solely to the Commission for the Transportation 592 Disadvantaged, or other local public agency under the provisions 593 in the state purchasing contracts, and purchases, from the 594 corporation operating the correctional work programs, of 595 products or services that are subject to paragraph (1)(f), are 596 exempt from the competitive solicitation requirements otherwise 597 applying to their purchases. 598 (c)âAny person who files an action protesting a decision or 599 intended decision pertaining to contracts administered by the 600 department, a water management district, or an agency pursuant 601 to s. 120.57(3)(b) must shall post with the department, the 602 water management district, or the agency at the time of filing 603 the formal written protest a bond payable to the department, the 604 water management district, or agency in an amount equal to 1 605 percent of the estimated contract amount. For protests of 606 decisions or intended decisions pertaining to exceptional 607 purchases, the bond must shall be in an amount equal to 1 608 percent of the estimated contract amount for the exceptional 609 purchase. The estimated contract amount must shall be based upon 610 the contract price submitted by the protestor or, if no contract 611 price was submitted, the department, water management district, 612 or agency must shall estimate the contract amount based on 613 factors including, but not limited to, the price of previous or 614 existing contracts for similar commodities or contractual 615 services, the amount appropriated by the Legislature for the 616 contract, or the fair market value of similar commodities or 617 contractual services. The agency shall provide the estimated 618 contract amount to the vendor within 72 hours, excluding 619 Saturdays, Sundays, and state holidays, after the filing of the 620 notice of protest by the vendor. The estimated contract amount 621 is not subject to protest pursuant to s. 120.57(3). The bond is 622 shall be conditioned upon the payment of all costs and charges 623 that are adjudged against the protestor in the administrative 624 hearing in which the action is brought and in any subsequent 625 appellate court proceeding. In lieu of a bond, the department, 626 the water management district, or agency may, in either case, 627 accept a cashierâs check, official bank check, or money order in 628 the amount of the bond. If, after completion of the 629 administrative hearing process and any appellate court 630 proceedings, the department, water management district, or 631 agency prevails, it shall recover all costs and charges which 632 must shall be included in the final order or judgment, excluding 633 attorney attorneyâs fees. This section shall not apply to 634 protests filed by the Office of Supplier Diversity. Upon payment 635 of such costs and charges by the protestor, the bond, cashierâs 636 check, official bank check, or money order must shall be 637 returned to the protestor. If, after the completion of the 638 administrative hearing process and any appellate court 639 proceedings, the protestor prevails, the protestor shall recover 640 from the department, water management district, or agency all 641 costs and charges which must shall be included in the final 642 order or judgment, excluding attorney attorneyâs fees. 643 (3)âTo establish a system of coordinated, uniform 644 procurement policies, procedures, and practices to be used by 645 agencies in acquiring commodities and contractual services, 646 which must shall include, but not be limited to: 647 (b)1.âDevelopment of procedures for advertising 648 solicitations. These procedures must provide for electronic 649 posting of solicitations for at least 10 days before the date 650 set for receipt of bids, proposals, or replies, unless the 651 department or other agency determines in writing that a shorter 652 period of time is necessary to avoid harming the interests of 653 the state. The Office of Supplier Diversity may consult with the 654 department regarding the development of solicitation 655 distribution procedures to ensure that maximum distribution is 656 afforded to certified minority business enterprises as defined 657 in s. 288.703. 658 2.âDevelopment of procedures for electronic posting. The 659 department shall designate a centralized website on the Internet 660 for the department and other agencies to electronically post 661 solicitations, decisions or intended decisions, and other 662 matters relating to procurement. 663 (c)âDevelopment of procedures for the receipt and opening 664 of bids, proposals, or replies by an agency. Such procedures 665 shall provide the Office of Supplier Diversity an opportunity to 666 monitor and ensure that the contract award is consistent with 667 the requirements of s. 287.09451. 668 Section 12.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) and paragraph 669 (b) of subsection (4) of section 287.055, Florida Statutes, are 670 amended to read: 671 287.055âAcquisition of professional architectural, 672 engineering, landscape architectural, or surveying and mapping 673 services; definitions; procedures; contingent fees prohibited; 674 penalties.â 675 (3)âPUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENT AND QUALIFICATION PROCEDURES.â 676 (d)âEach agency shall evaluate professional services, 677 including capabilities, adequacy of personnel, past record, 678 experience, whether the firm is a certified minority business 679 enterprise as defined by the Florida Small and Minority Business 680 Assistance Act, and other factors determined by the agency as to 681 be applicable to its particular requirements. When securing 682 professional services, an agency must endeavor to meet the 683 minority business enterprise procurement goals under s. 684 287.09451. 685 (4)âCOMPETITIVE SELECTION.â 686 (b)âThe agency shall select in order of preference no fewer 687 than three firms deemed to be the most highly qualified to 688 perform the required services. In determining whether a firm is 689 qualified, the agency shall consider such factors as the ability 690 of professional personnel; whether a firm is a certified 691 minority business enterprise; past performance; willingness to 692 meet time and budget requirements; location; recent, current, 693 and projected workloads of the firms; and the volume of work 694 previously awarded to each firm by the agency, with the object 695 of effecting an equitable distribution of contracts among 696 qualified firms, provided such distribution does not violate the 697 principle of selection of the most highly qualified firms. The 698 agency may request, accept, and consider proposals for the 699 compensation to be paid under the contract only during 700 competitive negotiations under subsection (5). 701 Section 13.âSubsections (7), (8), (12), (14), and (18) of 702 section 287.057, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 703 287.057âProcurement of commodities or contractual 704 services.â 705 (7)âUpon issuance of any solicitation, an agency shall, 706 upon request by the department, forward to the department one 707 copy of each solicitation for all commodity and contractual 708 services purchases in excess of the threshold amount provided in 709 s. 287.017 for CATEGORY TWO. An agency shall also, upon request, 710 furnish a copy of all competitive-solicitation tabulations. The 711 Office of Supplier Diversity may also request from the agencies 712 any information submitted to the department pursuant to this 713 subsection. 714 (8)(a)âIn order to strive to meet the minority business 715 enterprise procurement goals set forth in s. 287.09451, an 716 agency may reserve any contract for competitive solicitation 717 only among certified minority business enterprises. Agencies 718 shall review all their contracts each fiscal year and shall 719 determine which contracts may be reserved for solicitation only 720 among certified minority business enterprises. This reservation 721 may only be used when it is determined, by reasonable and 722 objective means, before the solicitation that there are capable, 723 qualified certified minority business enterprises available to 724 submit a bid, proposal, or reply on a contract to provide for 725 effective competition. The Office of Supplier Diversity shall 726 consult with any agency in reaching such determination when 727 deemed appropriate. 728 (b)âBefore a contract may be reserved for solicitation only 729 among certified minority business enterprises, the agency head 730 must find that such a reservation is in the best interests of 731 the state. All determinations shall be subject to s. 732 287.09451(5). Once a decision has been made to reserve a 733 contract, but before sealed bids, proposals, or replies are 734 requested, the agency shall estimate what it expects the amount 735 of the contract to be, based on the nature of the services or 736 commodities involved and their value under prevailing market 737 conditions. If all the sealed bids, proposals, or replies 738 received are over this estimate, the agency may reject the bids, 739 proposals, or replies and request new ones from certified 740 minority business enterprises, or the agency may reject the 741 bids, proposals, or replies and reopen the bidding to all 742 eligible vendors. 743 (c)âAll agencies shall consider the use of price 744 preferences of up to 10 percent, weighted preference formulas, 745 or other preferences for vendors as determined appropriate 746 pursuant to guidelines established in accordance with s. 747 287.09451(4) to increase the participation of minority business 748 enterprises. 749 (d)âAll agencies shall avoid any undue concentration of 750 contracts or purchases in categories of commodities or 751 contractual services in order to meet the minority business 752 enterprise purchasing goals in s. 287.09451. 753 (12)âIf two equal responses to a solicitation or a request 754 for quote are received and one response is from a certified 755 minority business enterprise, the agency shall enter into a 756 contract with the certified minority business enterprise. 757 (12)(14)âContracts for commodities or contractual services 758 may be renewed for a period that may not exceed 3 years or the 759 term of the original contract, whichever is longer. Renewal of a 760 contract for commodities or contractual services must be in 761 writing and is subject to the same terms and conditions set 762 forth in the initial contract and any written amendments signed 763 by the parties. If the commodity or contractual service is 764 purchased as a result of the solicitation of bids, proposals, or 765 replies, the price of the commodity or contractual service to be 766 renewed must be specified in the bid, proposal, or reply, except 767 that an agency may negotiate lower pricing. A renewal contract 768 may not include any compensation for costs associated with the 769 renewal. Renewals are contingent upon satisfactory performance 770 evaluations by the agency and subject to the availability of 771 funds. Exceptional purchase contracts pursuant to paragraphs 772 (3)(a) and (c) may not be renewed. With the exception of 773 subsection (10) (11), if a contract amendment results in a 774 longer contract term or increased payments, a state agency may 775 not renew or amend a contract for the outsourcing of a service 776 or activity that has an original term value exceeding $5 million 777 before submitting a written report concerning contract 778 performance to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and 779 the Speaker of the House of Representatives at least 90 days 780 before execution of the renewal or amendment. 781 (16)(18)âAny person who supervises contract administrators 782 or contract or grant managers that meet criteria for 783 certification in subsection (13) (15) shall annually complete 784 public procurement training for supervisors within 12 months 785 after appointment to the supervisory position. The department is 786 responsible for establishing and disseminating the training 787 course content required for supervisors. 788 Section 14.âParagraph (c) of subsection (10) of section 789 287.059, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 790 287.059âPrivate attorney services.â 791 (10)âAgencies are encouraged to use the following criteria 792 when selecting outside firms for attorney services: 793 (c)âThe firmâs minority status. 794 Section 15.âSection 287.093, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 795 Section 16.âSection 287.0931, Florida Statutes, is 796 repealed. 797 Section 17.âSection 287.0943, Florida Statutes, is 798 repealed. 799 Section 18.âSection 287.09431, Florida Statutes, is 800 repealed. 801 Section 19.âSection 287.09451, Florida Statutes, is amended 802 to read: 803 287.09451âOffice of Supplier Development Diversity; powers, 804 duties, and functions.â 805 (1)âThe Legislature finds that there is evidence of a 806 systematic pattern of past and continuing racial discrimination 807 against minority business enterprises and a disparity in the 808 availability and use of minority business enterprises in the 809 state procurement system. It is determined to be a compelling 810 state interest to rectify such discrimination and disparity. 811 Based upon statistical data profiling this discrimination, the 812 Legislature has enacted race-conscious and gender-conscious 813 remedial programs to ensure minority participation in the 814 economic life of the state, in state contracts for the purchase 815 of commodities and services, and in construction contracts. The 816 purpose and intent of this section is to increase participation 817 by minority business enterprises accomplished by encouraging the 818 use of minority business enterprises and the entry of new and 819 diversified minority business enterprises into the marketplace. 820 (2)âThe Office of Supplier Development Diversity is 821 established within the Department of Management Services to 822 assist Florida-based small minority business enterprises in 823 becoming suppliers of commodities, services, and construction to 824 state government. 825 (2)(3)âThe secretary shall appoint an executive director 826 for the Office of Supplier Development Diversity, who serves 827 shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary. 828 (3)(4)âThe Office of Supplier Development has Diversity 829 shall have the following powers, duties, and functions: 830 (a)âTo adopt rules to determine what constitutes a âgood 831 faith effortâ for purposes of state agency compliance with the 832 minority business enterprise procurement goals set forth in s. 833 287.042. Factors which shall be considered by the Minority 834 Business Enterprise Assistance Office in determining good faith 835 effort shall include, but not be limited to: 836 1.âWhether the agency scheduled presolicitation or prebid 837 meetings for the purpose of informing minority business 838 enterprises of contracting and subcontracting opportunities. 839 2.âWhether the contractor advertised in general 840 circulation, trade association, or minority-focus media 841 concerning the subcontracting opportunities. 842 3.âWhether the agency effectively used services and 843 resources of available minority community organizations; 844 minority contractorsâ groups; local, state, and federal minority 845 business assistance offices; and other organizations that 846 provide assistance in the recruitment and placement of minority 847 business enterprises or minority persons. 848 4.âWhether the agency provided written notice to a 849 reasonable number of minority business enterprises that their 850 interest in contracting with the agency was being solicited in 851 sufficient time to allow the minority business enterprises to 852 participate effectively. 853 (b)âTo adopt rules to determine what constitutes a âgood 854 faith effortâ for purposes of contractor compliance with 855 contractual requirements relating to the use of services or 856 commodities of a minority business enterprise under s. 857 287.094(2). Factors which shall be considered by the Office of 858 Supplier Diversity in determining whether a contractor has made 859 good faith efforts shall include, but not be limited to: 860 1.âWhether the contractor attended any presolicitation or 861 prebid meetings that were scheduled by the agency to inform 862 minority business enterprises of contracting and subcontracting 863 opportunities. 864 2.âWhether the contractor advertised in general 865 circulation, trade association, or minority-focus media 866 concerning the subcontracting opportunities. 867 3.âWhether the contractor provided written notice to a 868 reasonable number of specific minority business enterprises that 869 their interest in the contract was being solicited in sufficient 870 time to allow the minority business enterprises to participate 871 effectively. 872 4.âWhether the contractor followed up initial solicitations 873 of interest by contacting minority business enterprises or 874 minority persons to determine with certainty whether the 875 minority business enterprises or minority persons were 876 interested. 877 5.âWhether the contractor selected portions of the work to 878 be performed by minority business enterprises in order to 879 increase the likelihood of meeting the minority business 880 enterprise procurement goals, including, where appropriate, 881 breaking down contracts into economically feasible units to 882 facilitate minority business enterprise participation. 883 6.âWhether the contractor provided interested minority 884 business enterprises or minority persons with adequate 885 information about the plans, specifications, and requirements of 886 the contract or the availability of jobs. 887 7.âWhether the contractor negotiated in good faith with 888 interested minority business enterprises or minority persons, 889 not rejecting minority business enterprises or minority persons 890 as unqualified without sound reasons based on a thorough 891 investigation of their capabilities. 892 8.âWhether the contractor effectively used the services of 893 available minority community organizations; minority 894 contractorsâ groups; local, state, and federal minority business 895 assistance offices; and other organizations that provide 896 assistance in the recruitment and placement of minority business 897 enterprises or minority persons. 898 (c)âTo adopt rules and do all things necessary or 899 convenient to guide all state agencies toward making 900 expenditures for commodities, contractual services, 901 construction, and architectural and engineering services with 902 certified minority business enterprises in accordance with the 903 minority business enterprise procurement goals set forth in s. 904 287.042. 905 (d)âTo monitor the degree to which agencies procure 906 services, commodities, and construction from minority business 907 enterprises in conjunction with the Department of Financial 908 Services as specified in s. 17.11. 909 (e)âTo receive and disseminate information: 910 1.âFor the continued growth and success of Floridaâs small 911 businesses, which may include planning, hosting, and supporting 912 informational events targeted to Florida-based enterprises 913 relative to procurement opportunities, availability of minority 914 business enterprises, and technical assistance. 915 2.âRelated to procurement opportunities for Florida-based 916 small business enterprises, providing technical assistance as 917 needed. 918 (b)âTo create electronic certification and recertification 919 processes for veteran-owned business enterprises. The initial 920 certification is valid for 2 years and must be recertified 921 biennially thereafter. The benefits of certification must be 922 clearly posted on the departmentâs website. To be eligible for 923 certification and recertification as a veteran-owned business 924 enterprise, a business must meet the requirements of s. 295.187. 925 (c)(f)âTo advise and provide education or other resources 926 to agencies on methods and techniques for achieving procurement 927 objectives that increase the use of Florida-based enterprises in 928 state and local government procurement contracts. 929 (d)âTo adopt rules, establish processes, and prescribe and 930 publish forms as necessary to carry out the duties of the office 931 provided in this section. 932 (g)âTo provide a central minority business enterprise 933 certification process which includes independent verification of 934 status as a minority business enterprise. 935 (h)âTo develop procedures to investigate complaints against 936 minority business enterprises or contractors alleged to violate 937 any provision related to this section or s. 287.0943, that may 938 include visits to worksites or business premises, and to refer 939 all information on businesses suspected of misrepresenting 940 minority status to the Department of Management Services for 941 investigation. When an investigation is completed and there is 942 reason to believe that a violation has occurred, the matter 943 shall be referred to the office of the Attorney General, 944 Department of Legal Affairs, for prosecution. 945 (i)âTo maintain a directory of all minority business 946 enterprises which have been certified and provide this 947 information to any agency or business requesting it. 948 (j)âTo encourage all firms which do more than $1 million in 949 business with the state within a 12-month period to develop, 950 implement, and submit to this office a minority business 951 development plan. 952 (k)âTo communicate on a monthly basis with the Small and 953 Minority Business Advisory Council to keep the council informed 954 on issues relating to minority enterprise procurement. 955 (l)âTo serve as an advocate for minority business 956 enterprises, and coordinate with the small and minority business 957 ombudsman, as defined in s. 288.703, which duties shall include: 958 1.âEnsuring that agencies supported by state funding 959 effectively target the delivery of services and resources, as 960 related to minority business enterprises. 961 2.âEstablishing standards within each industry with which 962 the state government contracts on how agencies and contractors 963 may provide the maximum practicable opportunity for minority 964 business enterprises. 965 3.âAssisting agencies and contractors by providing outreach 966 to minority businesses, by specifying and monitoring technical 967 and managerial competence for minority business enterprises, and 968 by consulting in planning of agency procurement to determine how 969 best to provide opportunities for minority business enterprises. 970 4.âIntegrating technical and managerial assistance for 971 minority business enterprises with government contracting 972 opportunities. 973 (m)âTo certify minority business enterprises, as defined in 974 s. 288.703, and as specified in ss. 287.0943 and 287.09431, and 975 shall recertify such minority businesses at least once every 2 976 years. Minority business enterprises must be recertified at 977 least once every 2 years. Such certifications may include an 978 electronic signature. 979 (n)1.âTo develop procedures to be used by an agency in 980 identifying commodities, contractual services, architectural and 981 engineering services, and construction contracts, except those 982 architectural, engineering, construction, or other related 983 services or contracts subject to the provisions of chapter 339, 984 that could be provided by minority business enterprises. Each 985 agency is encouraged to spend 21 percent of the moneys actually 986 expended for construction contracts, 25 percent of the moneys 987 actually expended for architectural and engineering contracts, 988 24 percent of the moneys actually expended for commodities, and 989 50.5 percent of the moneys actually expended for contractual 990 services during the previous fiscal year, except for the state 991 university construction program which shall be based upon public 992 education capital outlay projections for the subsequent fiscal 993 year, and reported to the Legislature pursuant to s. 216.023, 994 for the purpose of entering into contracts with certified 995 minority business enterprises as defined in s. 288.703, or 996 approved joint ventures. However, in the event of budget 997 reductions pursuant to s. 216.221, the base amounts may be 998 adjusted to reflect such reductions. The overall spending goal 999 for each industry category shall be subdivided as follows: 1000 a.âFor construction contracts: 4 percent for black 1001 Americans, 6 percent for Hispanic-Americans, and 11 percent for 1002 American women. 1003 b.âFor architectural and engineering contracts: 9 percent 1004 for Hispanic-Americans, 1 percent for Asian-Americans, and 15 1005 percent for American women. 1006 c.âFor commodities: 2 percent for black Americans, 4 1007 percent for Hispanic-Americans, 0.5 percent for Asian-Americans, 1008 0.5 percent for Native Americans, and 17 percent for American 1009 women. 1010 d.âFor contractual services: 6 percent for black Americans, 1011 7 percent for Hispanic-Americans, 1 percent for Asian-Americans, 1012 0.5 percent for Native Americans, and 36 percent for American 1013 women. 1014 2.âFor the purposes of commodities contracts for the 1015 purchase of equipment to be used in the construction and 1016 maintenance of state transportation facilities involving the 1017 Department of Transportation, the terms âminority business 1018 enterpriseâ and âminority personâ have the same meanings as 1019 provided in s. 288.703. In order to ensure that the goals 1020 established under this paragraph for contracting with certified 1021 minority business enterprises are met, the department, with the 1022 assistance of the Office of Supplier Diversity, shall make 1023 recommendations to the Legislature on revisions to the goals, 1024 based on an updated statistical analysis, at least once every 5 1025 years. Such recommendations shall be based on statistical data 1026 indicating the availability of and disparity in the use of 1027 minority businesses contracting with the state. 1028 3.âIn determining the base amounts for assessing compliance 1029 with this paragraph, the Office of Supplier Diversity may 1030 develop, by rule, guidelines for all agencies to use in 1031 establishing such base amounts. These rules must include, but 1032 are not limited to, guidelines for calculation of base amounts, 1033 a deadline for the agencies to submit base amounts, a deadline 1034 for approval of the base amounts by the Office of Supplier 1035 Diversity, and procedures for adjusting the base amounts as a 1036 result of budget reductions made pursuant to s. 216.221. 1037 4.âTo determine guidelines for the use of price 1038 preferences, weighted preference formulas, or other preferences, 1039 as appropriate to the particular industry or trade, to increase 1040 the participation of minority businesses in state contracting. 1041 These guidelines shall include consideration of: 1042 a.âSize and complexity of the project. 1043 b.âThe concentration of transactions with minority business 1044 enterprises for the commodity or contractual services in 1045 question in prior agency contracting. 1046 c.âThe specificity and definition of work allocated to 1047 participating minority business enterprises. 1048 d.âThe capacity of participating minority business 1049 enterprises to complete the tasks identified in the project. 1050 e.âThe available pool of minority business enterprises as 1051 prime contractors, either alone or as partners in an approved 1052 joint venture that serves as the prime contractor. 1053 5.âTo determine guidelines for use of joint ventures to 1054 meet minority business enterprises spending goals. For purposes 1055 of this section, âjoint ventureâ means any association of two or 1056 more business concerns to carry out a single business enterprise 1057 for profit, for which purpose they combine their property, 1058 capital, efforts, skills, and knowledge. The guidelines shall 1059 allow transactions with joint ventures to be eligible for credit 1060 against the minority business enterprise goals of an agency when 1061 the contracting joint venture demonstrates that at least one 1062 partner to the joint venture is a certified minority business 1063 enterprise as defined in s. 288.703, and that such partner is 1064 responsible for a clearly defined portion of the work to be 1065 performed, and shares in the ownership, control, management, 1066 responsibilities, risks, and profits of the joint venture. Such 1067 demonstration shall be by verifiable documents and sworn 1068 statements and may be reviewed by the Office of Supplier 1069 Diversity at or before the time a contract bid, proposal, or 1070 reply is submitted. An agency may count toward its minority 1071 business enterprise goals a portion of the total dollar amount 1072 of a contract equal to the percentage of the ownership and 1073 control held by the qualifying certified minority business 1074 partners in the contracting joint venture, so long as the joint 1075 venture meets the guidelines adopted by the office. 1076 (o)1.âTo establish a system to record and measure the use 1077 of certified minority business enterprises in state contracting. 1078 This system shall maintain information and statistics on 1079 certified minority business enterprise participation, awards, 1080 dollar volume of expenditures and agency goals, and other 1081 appropriate types of information to analyze progress in the 1082 access of certified minority business enterprises to state 1083 contracts and to monitor agency compliance with this section. 1084 Such reporting must include, but is not limited to, the 1085 identification of all subcontracts in state contracting by 1086 dollar amount and by number of subcontracts and the 1087 identification of the utilization of certified minority business 1088 enterprises as prime contractors and subcontractors by dollar 1089 amounts of contracts and subcontracts, number of contracts and 1090 subcontracts, minority status, industry, and any conditions or 1091 circumstances that significantly affected the performance of 1092 subcontractors. Agencies shall report their compliance with the 1093 requirements of this reporting system at least annually and at 1094 the request of the office. All agencies shall cooperate with the 1095 office in establishing this reporting system. Except in 1096 construction contracting, all agencies shall review contracts 1097 costing in excess of CATEGORY FOUR as defined in s. 287.017 to 1098 determine if such contracts could be divided into smaller 1099 contracts to be separately solicited and awarded, and shall, 1100 when economical, offer such smaller contracts to encourage 1101 minority participation. 1102 2.âTo report agency compliance with the provisions of 1103 subparagraph 1. for the preceding fiscal year to the Governor 1104 and Cabinet, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 1105 House of Representatives on or before February 1 of each year. 1106 The report must contain, at a minimum, the following: 1107 a.âTotal expenditures of each agency by industry. 1108 b.âThe dollar amount and percentage of contracts awarded to 1109 certified minority business enterprises by each state agency. 1110 c.âThe dollar amount and percentage of contracts awarded 1111 indirectly to certified minority business enterprises as 1112 subcontractors by each state agency. 1113 d.âThe total dollar amount and percentage of contracts 1114 awarded to certified minority business enterprises, whether 1115 directly or indirectly, as subcontractors. 1116 e.âA statement and assessment of good faith efforts taken 1117 by each state agency. 1118 f.âA status report of agency compliance with subsection 1119 (6), as determined by the Minority Business Enterprise Office. 1120 (5)(a)âEach agency shall, at the time the specifications or 1121 designs are developed or contract sizing is determined for any 1122 proposed procurement costing in excess of CATEGORY FOUR, as 1123 defined in s. 287.017, forward a notice to the Office of 1124 Supplier Diversity of the proposed procurement and any 1125 determination on the designs of specifications of the proposed 1126 procurement that impose requirements on prospective vendors, no 1127 later than 30 days prior to the issuance of a solicitation, 1128 except that this provision shall not apply to emergency 1129 acquisitions. The 30-day notice period shall not toll the time 1130 for any other procedural requirements. 1131 (b)âIf the Office of Supplier Diversity determines that the 1132 proposed procurement will not likely allow opportunities for 1133 minority business enterprises, the office may, within 20 days 1134 after it receives the information specified in paragraph (a), 1135 propose the implementation of minority business enterprise 1136 utilization provisions or submit alternative procurement methods 1137 that would significantly increase minority business enterprise 1138 contracting opportunities. 1139 (c)âWhenever the agency and the Office of Supplier 1140 Diversity disagree, the matter shall be submitted for 1141 determination to the head of the agency or the senior-level 1142 official designated pursuant to this section as liaison for 1143 minority business enterprise issues. 1144 (d)âIf the proposed procurement proceeds to competitive 1145 solicitation, the office is hereby granted standing to protest, 1146 pursuant to this section, in a timely manner, any contract award 1147 during competitive solicitation for contractual services and 1148 construction contracts that fail to include minority business 1149 enterprise participation, if any responsible and responsive 1150 vendor has demonstrated the ability to achieve any level of 1151 participation, or, any contract award for commodities where, a 1152 reasonable and economical opportunity to reserve a contract, 1153 statewide or district level, for minority participation was not 1154 executed or, an agency failed to adopt an applicable preference 1155 for minority participation. The bond requirement shall be waived 1156 for the office purposes of this subsection. 1157 (e)âAn agency may presume that a vendor offering no 1158 minority participation has not made a good faith effort when 1159 other vendors offer minority participation of firms listed as 1160 relevant to the agencyâs purchasing needs in the pertinent 1161 locality or statewide to complete the project. 1162 (f)âParagraph (a) will not apply when the Office of 1163 Supplier Diversity determines that an agency has established a 1164 work plan to allow advance consultation and planning with 1165 minority business enterprises and where such plan clearly 1166 demonstrates: 1167 1.âA high level of advance planning by the agency with 1168 minority business enterprises. 1169 2.âA high level of accessibility, knowledge, and experience 1170 by minority business enterprises in the agencyâs contract 1171 decisionmaking process. 1172 3.âA high quality of agency monitoring and enforcement of 1173 internal implementation of minority business utilization 1174 provisions. 1175 4.âA high quality of agency monitoring and enforcement of 1176 contractor utilization of minority business enterprises, 1177 especially tracking subcontractor data, and ensuring the 1178 integrity of subcontractor reporting. 1179 5.âA high quality of agency outreach, agency networking of 1180 major vendors with minority vendors, and innovation in 1181 techniques to improve utilization of minority business 1182 enterprises. 1183 6.âSubstantial commitment, sensitivity, and proactive 1184 attitude by the agency head and among the agency minority 1185 business staff. 1186 (6)âEach state agency shall coordinate its minority 1187 business enterprise procurement activities with the Office of 1188 Supplier Diversity. At a minimum, each agency shall: 1189 (a)âAdopt a minority business enterprise utilization plan 1190 for review and approval by the Office of Supplier Diversity 1191 which should require meaningful and useful methods to attain the 1192 legislative intent in assisting minority business enterprises. 1193 (b)âDesignate a senior-level employee in the agency as a 1194 minority enterprise assistance officer, responsible for 1195 overseeing the agencyâs minority business utilization 1196 activities, and who is not also charged with purchasing 1197 responsibility. A senior-level agency employee and agency 1198 purchasing officials shall be accountable to the agency head for 1199 the agencyâs minority business utilization performance. The 1200 Office of Supplier Diversity shall advise each agency on 1201 compliance performance. 1202 (c)âIf an agency deviates significantly from its 1203 utilization plan in 2 consecutive or 3 out of 5 total fiscal 1204 years, the Office of Supplier Diversity may review any and all 1205 solicitations and contract awards of the agency as deemed 1206 necessary until such time as the agency meets its utilization 1207 plan. 1208 Section 20.âSection 287.0947, Florida Statutes, is 1209 repealed. 1210 Section 21.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 1211 288.001, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1212 288.001âThe Florida Small Business Development Center 1213 Network.â 1214 (4)âSTATEWIDE ADVISORY BOARD.â 1215 (b)âThe statewide advisory board shall consist of 19 1216 members from across this the state. At least 12 members must be 1217 representatives of the private sector who are knowledgeable of 1218 the needs and challenges of small businesses. The members must 1219 represent various segments and industries of the economy in this 1220 state and must bring knowledge and skills to the statewide 1221 advisory board which would enhance the boardâs collective 1222 knowledge of small business assistance needs and challenges. 1223 Minority and gender representation must be considered when 1224 making appointments to the board. The board must include the 1225 following members: 1226 1.âThree members appointed from the private sector by the 1227 President of the Senate. 1228 2.âThree members appointed from the private sector by the 1229 Speaker of the House of Representatives. 1230 3.âThree members appointed from the private sector by the 1231 Governor. 1232 4.âThree members appointed from the private sector by the 1233 networkâs statewide director. 1234 5.âOne member appointed by the host institution. 1235 6.âThe Secretary of Commerce or his or her designee. 1236 7.âThe Chief Financial Officer or his or her designee. 1237 8.âThe President of the Florida Chamber of Commerce or his 1238 or her designee. 1239 9.âThe Small Business Development Center Project Officer 1240 from the U.S. Small Business Administration at the South Florida 1241 District Office or his or her designee. 1242 10.âThe executive director of the National Federation of 1243 Independent Businesses, Florida, or his or her designee. 1244 11.âThe executive director of the Florida United Business 1245 Association or his or her designee. 1246 Section 22.âSection 288.1167, Florida Statutes, is 1247 repealed. 1248 Section 23.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 1249 288.1229, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1250 288.1229âPromotion and development of sports-related 1251 industries and amateur athletics; direct-support organization 1252 established; powers and duties.â 1253 (2)âThe Florida Sports Foundation must: 1254 (b)âBe governed by a board of directors, which must consist 1255 of up to 15 members appointed by the Governor. In making 1256 appointments, the Governor must consider a potential memberâs 1257 background in community service and sports activism in, and 1258 financial support of, the sports industry, professional sports, 1259 or organized amateur athletics. Members must be residents of the 1260 state and highly knowledgeable about or active in professional 1261 or organized amateur sports. 1262 1.âThe board must contain representatives of all 1263 geographical regions of the state and must represent ethnic and 1264 gender diversity. 1265 2.âThe terms of office of the members are shall be 4 years. 1266 A No member may not serve more than two consecutive terms. The 1267 Governor may remove any member for cause and shall fill all 1268 vacancies that occur. 1269 Section 24.âSection 288.124, Florida Statutes, is amended 1270 to read: 1271 288.124âConvention grants program.âThe Florida Tourism 1272 Industry Marketing Corporation is authorized to establish a 1273 convention grants program and, pursuant to that program, to 1274 recommend to the department expenditures and contracts with 1275 local governments and nonprofit corporations or organizations 1276 for the purpose of attracting national conferences and 1277 conventions to Florida. Preference shall be given to local 1278 governments and nonprofit corporations or organizations seeking 1279 to attract minority conventions to Florida. Minority conventions 1280 are events that primarily involve minority persons, as defined 1281 in s. 288.703, who are residents or nonresidents of the state. 1282 The Florida Tourism Industry Marketing Corporation shall 1283 establish guidelines governing the award of grants and the 1284 administration of this program. The department has final 1285 approval authority for any grants under this section. The total 1286 annual allocation of funds for this program may shall not exceed 1287 $40,000. 1288 Section 25.âSubsection (2) of section 288.7015, Florida 1289 Statutes, is amended to read: 1290 288.7015âAppointment of rules ombudsman; duties.âThe 1291 Governor shall appoint a rules ombudsman, as defined in s. 1292 288.703, in the Executive Office of the Governor, for 1293 considering the impact of agency rules on the stateâs citizens 1294 and businesses. The duties of the rules ombudsman are to: 1295 (2)âReview state agency rules that adversely or 1296 disproportionately impact businesses, particularly those 1297 relating to small and minority businesses. 1298 Section 26.âSubsections (1), (3), and (5) of section 1299 288.703, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1300 288.703âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 288.702-288.706, the 1301 term: 1302 (1)ââCertified minority business enterpriseâ means a 1303 business which has been certified by the certifying organization 1304 or jurisdiction in accordance with s. 287.0943(1) and (2). 1305 (3)ââMinority business enterpriseâ means any small business 1306 concern as defined in subsection (6) which is organized to 1307 engage in commercial transactions, which is domiciled in 1308 Florida, and which is at least 51-percent-owned by minority 1309 persons who are members of an insular group that is of a 1310 particular racial, ethnic, or gender makeup or national origin, 1311 which has been subjected historically to disparate treatment due 1312 to identification in and with that group resulting in an 1313 underrepresentation of commercial enterprises under the groupâs 1314 control, and whose management and daily operations are 1315 controlled by such persons. A minority business enterprise may 1316 primarily involve the practice of a profession. Ownership by a 1317 minority person does not include ownership which is the result 1318 of a transfer from a nonminority person to a minority person 1319 within a related immediate family group if the combined total 1320 net asset value of all members of such family group exceeds $1 1321 million. For purposes of this subsection, the term ârelated 1322 immediate family groupâ means one or more children under 16 1323 years of age and a parent of such children or the spouse of such 1324 parent residing in the same house or living unit. 1325 (3)(5)ââOmbudsmanâ means an office or individual whose 1326 responsibilities include coordinating with the Office of 1327 Supplier Development Diversity for the interests of and 1328 providing assistance to small and minority business enterprises 1329 in dealing with governmental agencies and in developing 1330 proposals for changes in state agency rules. 1331 Section 27.âSection 288.7031, Florida Statutes, is amended 1332 to read: 1333 288.7031âApplication of the definition of âsmall businessâ 1334 certain definitions.âThe definition definitions of âsmall 1335 business,â âminority business enterprise,â and âcertified 1336 minority business enterpriseâ provided in s. 288.703 applies 1337 apply to the state and all political subdivisions of the state. 1338 Section 28.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 1339 288.776, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1340 288.776âBoard of directors; powers and duties.â 1341 (1)(a)âThe corporation shall have a board of directors 1342 consisting of 15 members representing all geographic areas of 1343 this the state. Minority and gender representation must be 1344 considered when making appointments to the board. The board 1345 membership must include: 1346 1.âA representative of the following businesses, all of 1347 which must be registered to do business in this state: a foreign 1348 bank, a state bank, a federal bank, an insurance company 1349 involved in covering trade financing risks, and a small or 1350 medium-sized exporter. 1351 2.âThe following persons or their designee: the Secretary 1352 of Commerce, the Chief Financial Officer, the Secretary of 1353 State, and a senior official of the United States Department of 1354 Commerce. 1355 Section 29.âParagraph (f) of subsection (1) of section 1356 290.0057, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1357 290.0057âEnterprise zone development plan.â 1358 (1)âAny application for designation as a new enterprise 1359 zone must be accompanied by a strategic plan adopted by the 1360 governing body of the municipality or county, or the governing 1361 bodies of the county and one or more municipalities together. At 1362 a minimum, the plan must: 1363 (f)âIdentify the amount of local and private resources that 1364 will be available in the nominated area and the private/public 1365 partnerships to be used, which may include participation by, and 1366 cooperation with, universities, community colleges, small 1367 business development centers, black business investment 1368 corporations, certified development corporations, and other 1369 private and public entities. 1370 Section 30.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 1371 290.046, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1372 290.046âApplications for grants; procedures; requirements.â 1373 (3) 1374 (c)âThe applicationâs program impact score, equal 1375 employment opportunity and fair housing score, and communitywide 1376 needs score may take into consideration scoring factors, 1377 including, but not limited to, unemployment, poverty levels, 1378 low-income and moderate-income populations, benefits to low 1379 income and moderate-income residents, use of minority-owned and 1380 woman-owned business enterprises in previous grants, health and 1381 safety issues, and the condition of physical structures. 1382 Section 31.âSubsection (3) of section 320.63, Florida 1383 Statutes, is amended to read: 1384 320.63âApplication for license; contents.âAny person 1385 desiring to be licensed pursuant to ss. 320.60-320.70 shall make 1386 application therefor to the department upon a form containing 1387 such information as the department requires. The department 1388 shall require, with such application or otherwise and from time 1389 to time, all of the following, which information may be 1390 considered by the department in determining the fitness of the 1391 applicant or licensee to engage in the business for which the 1392 applicant or licensee desires to be licensed: 1393 (3)âFrom each manufacturer, distributor, or importer which 1394 uses utilizes an identical blanket basic agreement for its 1395 dealers or distributors in this state, which agreement comprises 1396 all or any part of the applicantâs or licenseeâs agreements with 1397 motor vehicle dealers in this state, a copy of the written 1398 agreement and all supplements thereto, together with a list of 1399 the applicantâs or licenseeâs authorized dealers or distributors 1400 and their addresses. The applicant or licensee shall further 1401 notify the department immediately of the appointment of any 1402 additional dealer or distributor. The applicant or licensee 1403 shall annually report to the department on its efforts to add 1404 new minority dealer points, including difficulties encountered 1405 under ss. 320.61-320.70. For purposes of this section âminorityâ 1406 shall have the same meaning as that given it in the definition 1407 of âminority personâ in s. 288.703. Not later than 60 days 1408 before the date a revision or modification to a franchise 1409 agreement is offered uniformly to a licenseeâs motor vehicle 1410 dealers in this state, the licensee shall notify the department 1411 of such revision, modification, or addition to the franchise 1412 agreement on file with the department. In no event may a 1413 franchise agreement, or any addendum or supplement thereto, be 1414 offered to a motor vehicle dealer in this state until the 1415 applicant or licensee files an affidavit with the department 1416 acknowledging that the terms or provisions of the agreement, or 1417 any related document, are not inconsistent with, prohibited by, 1418 or contrary to the provisions contained in ss. 320.60-320.70. 1419 Any franchise agreement offered to a motor vehicle dealer in 1420 this state must shall provide that all terms and conditions in 1421 such agreement inconsistent with the law and rules of this state 1422 are of no force and effect. 1423 Section 32.âParagraph (g) of subsection (1) of section 1424 376.84, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1425 376.84âBrownfield redevelopment economic incentives.âIt is 1426 the intent of the Legislature that brownfield redevelopment 1427 activities be viewed as opportunities to significantly improve 1428 the utilization, general condition, and appearance of these 1429 sites. Different standards than those in place for new 1430 development, as allowed under current state and local laws, 1431 should be used to the fullest extent to encourage the 1432 redevelopment of a brownfield. State and local governments are 1433 encouraged to offer redevelopment incentives for this purpose, 1434 as an ongoing public investment in infrastructure and services, 1435 to help eliminate the public health and environmental hazards, 1436 and to promote the creation of jobs in these areas. Such 1437 incentives may include financial, regulatory, and technical 1438 assistance to persons and businesses involved in the 1439 redevelopment of the brownfield pursuant to this act. 1440 (1)âFinancial incentives and local incentives for 1441 redevelopment may include, but not be limited to: 1442 (g)âMinority business enterprise programs as provided in s. 1443 287.0943. 1444 Section 33.âSubsection (5) of section 383.216, Florida 1445 Statutes, is amended to read: 1446 383.216âCommunity-based prenatal and infant health care.â 1447 (5)âThe membership of each prenatal and infant health care 1448 coalition shall represent health care providers, the recipient 1449 community, and the community at large; shall represent the 1450 racial, ethnic, and gender composition of the community; and 1451 shall include at least the following: 1452 (a)âConsumers of family planning, primary care, or prenatal 1453 care services, at least two of whom are low-income or Medicaid 1454 eligible. 1455 (b)âHealth care providers, including: 1456 1.âCounty health departments. 1457 2.âMigrant and community health centers. 1458 3.âHospitals. 1459 4.âLocal medical societies. 1460 5.âLocal health planning organizations. 1461 (c)âLocal health advocacy interest groups and community 1462 organizations. 1463 (d)âCounty and municipal governments. 1464 (e)âSocial service organizations. 1465 (f)âLocal education communities. 1466 Section 34.âSection 395.807, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 1467 Section 35.âSubsection (24) of section 409.901, Florida 1468 Statutes, is amended to read: 1469 409.901âDefinitions; ss. 409.901-409.920.âAs used in ss. 1470 409.901-409.920, except as otherwise specifically provided, the 1471 term: 1472 (24)ââMinority physician networkâ means a network of 1473 primary care physicians with experience managing Medicaid or 1474 Medicare recipients that is predominantly owned by minorities as 1475 defined in s. 288.703, which may have a collaborative 1476 partnership with a public college or university and a tax-exempt 1477 charitable corporation. 1478 Section 36.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) of section 1479 409.920, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1480 409.920âMedicaid provider fraud.â 1481 (1)âFor the purposes of this section, the term: 1482 (e)ââManaged care plansâ means a health insurer authorized 1483 under chapter 624, an exclusive provider organization authorized 1484 under chapter 627, a health maintenance organization authorized 1485 under chapter 641, a prepaid health plan authorized under this 1486 chapter, a provider service network authorized under this 1487 chapter, a minority physician network authorized under this 1488 chapter, and an emergency department diversion program 1489 authorized under this chapter or the General Appropriations Act, 1490 providing health care services pursuant to a contract with the 1491 Medicaid program. 1492 Section 37.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 1493 430.502, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1494 430.502âAlzheimerâs disease; memory disorder clinics and 1495 day care and respite care programs.â 1496 (4)âThe department shall develop performance goals that 1497 exceed the minimum performance standards developed under 1498 subsection (3), which goals must be achieved in order for a 1499 memory disorder clinic to be eligible for incentive funding 1500 above the base level, subject to legislative appropriation. 1501 Incentive funding shall be based on criteria including, but not 1502 limited to: 1503 (b)âSignificant increase in public outreach to low-income 1504 and minority populations. 1505 Section 38.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 1506 440.45, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1507 440.45âOffice of the Judges of Compensation Claims.â 1508 (2) 1509 (b)âExcept as provided in paragraph (c), the Governor shall 1510 appoint a judge of compensation claims from a list of three 1511 persons nominated by a statewide nominating commission. The 1512 statewide nominating commission shall be composed of the 1513 following: 1514 1.âSix members, at least one of whom must be a member of a 1515 minority group as defined in s. 288.703, one of each who resides 1516 in each of the territorial jurisdictions of the district courts 1517 of appeal, appointed by the Board of Governors of The Florida 1518 Bar from among The Florida Bar members engaged in the practice 1519 of law. Each member shall be appointed for a 4-year term; 1520 2.âSix electors, at least one of whom must be a member of a 1521 minority group as defined in s. 288.703, one of each who resides 1522 in each of the territorial jurisdictions of the district courts 1523 of appeal, appointed by the Governor. Each member shall be 1524 appointed for a 4-year term; and 1525 3.âSix electors, at least one of whom must be a member of a 1526 minority group as defined in s. 288.703, one of each who resides 1527 in each of the territorial jurisdictions of the district courts 1528 of appeal, selected and appointed by a majority vote of the 1529 other 10 members of the commission. Each member shall be 1530 appointed for a 4-year term. 1531 1532 A vacancy occurring on the commission must shall be filled by 1533 the original appointing authority for the unexpired balance of 1534 the term. An attorney who appears before any judge of 1535 compensation claims more than four times a year is not eligible 1536 to serve on the statewide nominating commission. The meetings 1537 and determinations of the nominating commission as to the judges 1538 of compensation claims must shall be open to the public. 1539 Section 39.âSubsections (1) and (8) of section 445.007, 1540 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1541 445.007âLocal workforce development boards.â 1542 (1)âOne local workforce development board shall be 1543 appointed in each designated service delivery area and shall 1544 serve as the local workforce development board pursuant to Pub. 1545 L. No. 113-128. The membership of the local board must be 1546 consistent with Pub. L. No. 113-128, Title I, s. 107(b). If a 1547 public education or training provider is represented on the 1548 local board, a representative of a private education provider 1549 must also be appointed to the local board. The state board may 1550 waive this requirement if requested by a local board if it is 1551 demonstrated that such representatives do not exist in the 1552 region. The importance of minority and gender representation 1553 shall be considered when making appointments to the local board. 1554 The local board, its committees, subcommittees, and 1555 subdivisions, and other units of the workforce system, including 1556 units that may consist in whole or in part of local governmental 1557 units, may use any method of telecommunications to conduct 1558 meetings, including establishing a quorum through 1559 telecommunications, provided that the public is given proper 1560 notice of the telecommunications meeting and reasonable access 1561 to observe and, when appropriate, participate. Local boards are 1562 subject to chapters 119 and 286 and s. 24, Art. I of the State 1563 Constitution. Each member of a local board who is not otherwise 1564 required to file a full and public disclosure of financial 1565 interests under s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution or s. 1566 112.3144 shall file a statement of financial interests under s. 1567 112.3145. The executive director or designated person 1568 responsible for the operational and administrative functions of 1569 the local board who is not otherwise required to file a full and 1570 public disclosure of financial interests under s. 8, Art. II of 1571 the State Constitution or s. 112.3144 shall file a statement of 1572 financial interests under s. 112.3145. The local boardâs 1573 website, or the departmentâs website if the local board does not 1574 maintain a website, must inform the public that each disclosure 1575 or statement has been filed with the Commission on Ethics and 1576 provide information how each disclosure or statement may be 1577 reviewed. The notice to the public must remain on the website 1578 throughout the term of office or employment of the filer and 1579 until 1 year after the term on the local board or employment 1580 ends. 1581 (8)âThe importance of minority and gender representation 1582 shall be considered when appointments are made to any committee 1583 established by the local workforce development board. 1584 Section 40.âSubsection (12) of section 446.041, Florida 1585 Statutes, is amended to read: 1586 446.041âDuties of the department.âThe department shall: 1587 (12)âEnsure that minority and gender diversity are 1588 considered in administering this program. 1589 Section 41.âSubsection (4) of section 489.111, Florida 1590 Statutes, is amended to read: 1591 489.111âLicensure by examination.â 1592 (4)âThe department shall ensure that a sensitivity review 1593 committee has been established including representatives of 1594 various ethnic/minority groups. No question found by this 1595 committee to be discriminatory against any ethnic/minority group 1596 shall be included in the examination. 1597 Section 42.âSubsection (7) of section 627.3511, Florida 1598 Statutes, is amended to read: 1599 627.3511âDepopulation of Citizens Property Insurance 1600 Corporation.â 1601 (7)âA minority business, which is at least 51 percent owned 1602 by minority persons as described in s. 288.703, desiring to 1603 operate or become licensed as a property and casualty insurer 1604 may exempt up to $50 of the escrow requirements of the take-out 1605 bonus, as described in this section. Such minority business, 1606 which has applied for a certificate of authority to engage in 1607 business as a property and casualty insurer, may simultaneously 1608 file the businessâ proposed take-out plan, as described in this 1609 section, with the corporation. 1610 Section 43.âSection 641.217, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 1611 Section 44.âChapter 760, Florida Statutes, entitled 1612 âDiscrimination in the Treatment of Persons; Minority 1613 Representationâ is retitled âDiscrimination in the Treatment of 1614 Persons.â 1615 Section 45.âSection 760.80, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 1616 Section 46.âPart V of chapter 760, Florida Statutes, is 1617 redesignated as part IV of that chapter. 1618 Section 47.âParagraph (d) of subsection (7) of section 1619 1001.706, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1620 1001.706âPowers and duties of the Board of Governors.â 1621 (7)âPOWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO PROPERTY.â 1622 (d)âThe Board of Governors, or the boardâs designee, shall 1623 ensure compliance with the provisions of s. 287.09451 for all 1624 procurement and ss. 255.101 and 255.102 for construction 1625 contracts, and rules adopted pursuant thereto, relating to the 1626 utilization of minority business enterprises, except that 1627 procurements costing less than the amount provided for in 1628 CATEGORY FIVE as provided in s. 287.017 shall not be subject to 1629 s. 287.09451. 1630 Section 48.âSubsections (1) and (10) of section 1004.42, 1631 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1632 1004.42âFlorida State University College of Medicine.â 1633 (1)âCREATION.âThere is hereby established a 4-year 1634 allopathic medical school within the Florida State University, 1635 to be known as the Florida State University College of Medicine, 1636 with a principal focus on recruiting and training medical 1637 professionals to meet the primary health care needs of the 1638 state, especially the needs of the stateâs elderly, rural, 1639 minority, and other underserved citizens. 1640 (10)âINCREASING PARTICIPATION OF UNDERREPRESENTED GROUPS. 1641 To increase the participation of underrepresented groups and 1642 socially and economically disadvantaged youth in science and 1643 medical programs, the College of Medicine shall continue the 1644 outreach efforts of the Program in Medical Sciences (PIMS) to 1645 middle and high school minority students, including the Science 1646 Students Together Reaching Instructional Diversity and 1647 Excellence (SSTRIDE), and shall build an endowment income to 1648 support recruitment programs and scholarship and financial aid 1649 packages for these students. To develop a base of qualified 1650 potential medical school candidates from underrepresented 1651 groups, the College of Medicine shall coordinate with the 1652 undergraduate premedical and science programs currently offered 1653 at the Florida State University, develop relationships with 1654 potential feeder institutions, including 4-year institutions and 1655 community colleges, and pursue grant funds to support programs, 1656 as well as support scholarship and financial aid packages. The 1657 College of Medicine shall develop plans for a postbaccalaureate, 1658 1-year academic program that provides a second chance to a 1659 limited number of students per year who have been declined 1660 medical school admission, who are state residents, and who meet 1661 established criteria as socially and economically disadvantaged. 1662 The College of Medicine shall make every effort, through 1663 recruitment and retention, to employ a faculty and support staff 1664 that reflect the heterogeneous nature of the stateâs general 1665 population. 1666 Section 49.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 1667 1004.435, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1668 1004.435âCancer control and research.â 1669 (4)âFLORIDA CANCER CONTROL AND RESEARCH ADVISORY COUNCIL; 1670 CREATION; COMPOSITION.â 1671 (a)âThere is created within the H. Lee Moffitt Cancer 1672 Center and Research Institute, Inc., the Florida Cancer Control 1673 and Research Advisory Council. The council shall consist of 16 1674 members, which includes the chair chairperson, all of whom must 1675 be residents of this state. The State Surgeon General or his or 1676 her designee within the Department of Health shall be one of the 1677 16 members. Members, except those appointed by the Governor, the 1678 Speaker of the House of Representatives, or the President of the 1679 Senate, must be appointed by the chief executive officer of the 1680 institution or organization represented, or his or her designee. 1681 One member must be a representative of the American Cancer 1682 Society; one member must be a representative of the Sylvester 1683 Comprehensive Cancer Center of the University of Miami; one 1684 member must be a representative of the University of Florida 1685 Shands Cancer Center; one member must be a representative of the 1686 Florida Nurses Association who specializes in the field of 1687 oncology and is not from an institution or organization already 1688 represented on the council; one member must be a representative 1689 of the Florida Osteopathic Medical Association who specializes 1690 in the field of oncology; one member must be a member of the 1691 Florida Medical Association who specializes in the field of 1692 oncology and who represents a cancer center not already 1693 represented on the council; one member must be a representative 1694 of the H. Lee Moffitt Cancer Center and Research Institute, 1695 Inc.; one member must be a representative of the Mayo Clinic in 1696 Jacksonville; one member must be a member of the Florida 1697 Hospital Association who specializes in the field of oncology 1698 and who represents a comprehensive cancer center not already 1699 represented on the council; one member must be a representative 1700 of the Association of Community Cancer Centers; one member must 1701 specialize in pediatric oncology research or clinical care 1702 appointed by the Governor; one member must specialize in 1703 oncology clinical care or research appointed by the President of 1704 the Senate; one member must be a current or former cancer 1705 patient or a current or former caregiver to a cancer patient 1706 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; one 1707 member must be a member of the House of Representatives 1708 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and 1709 one member must be a member of the Senate appointed by the 1710 President of the Senate. At least four of the members must be 1711 individuals who are minority persons as defined by s. 288.703. 1712 Section 50.âSection 1007.34, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 1713 Section 51.âSection 1007.35, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 1714 Section 52.âSection 1011.86, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 1715 Section 53.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 1716 1013.46, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1717 1013.46âAdvertising and awarding contracts; 1718 prequalification of contractor.â 1719 (1) 1720 (c)âAs an option, any county, municipality, or board may 1721 set aside up to 10 percent of the total amount of funds 1722 allocated for the purpose of entering into construction capital 1723 project contracts with minority business enterprises, as defined 1724 in s. 287.094. Such contracts shall be competitively bid only 1725 among minority business enterprises. The set-aside shall be used 1726 to redress present effects of past discriminatory practices and 1727 shall be subject to periodic reassessment to account for 1728 changing needs and circumstances. 1729 Section 54.âSubsection (1) of section 43.16, Florida 1730 Statutes, is amended to read: 1731 43.16âJustice Administrative Commission; membership, powers 1732 and duties.â 1733 (1)âThere is hereby created a Justice Administrative 1734 Commission, with headquarters located in the state capital. The 1735 necessary office space for use of the commission shall be 1736 furnished by the proper state agency in charge of state 1737 buildings. For purposes of the fees imposed on agencies pursuant 1738 to s. 287.057(22) s. 287.057(24), the Justice Administrative 1739 Commission shall be exempt from such fees. 1740 Section 55.âParagraph (g) of subsection (3) of section 1741 212.096, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1742 212.096âSales, rental, storage, use tax; enterprise zone 1743 jobs credit against sales tax.â 1744 (3)âIn order to claim this credit, an eligible business 1745 must file under oath with the governing body or enterprise zone 1746 development agency having jurisdiction over the enterprise zone 1747 where the business is located, as applicable, a statement which 1748 includes: 1749 (g)âWhether the business is a small business as defined by 1750 s. 288.703 s. 288.703(6). 1751 Section 56.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 1752 215.971, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1753 215.971âAgreements funded with federal or state 1754 assistance.â 1755 (2)âFor each agreement funded with federal or state 1756 financial assistance, the state agency shall designate an 1757 employee to function as a grant manager who shall be responsible 1758 for enforcing performance of the agreementâs terms and 1759 conditions and who shall serve as a liaison with the recipient 1760 or subrecipient. 1761 (a)1.âEach grant manager who is responsible for agreements 1762 in excess of the threshold amount for CATEGORY TWO under s. 1763 287.017 must, at a minimum, complete training conducted by the 1764 Chief Financial Officer for accountability in contracts and 1765 grant management. 1766 2.âEffective December 1, 2014, each grant manager 1767 responsible for agreements in excess of $100,000 annually must 1768 complete the training and become a certified contract manager as 1769 provided under s. 287.057(13) s. 287.057(15). All grant managers 1770 must become certified contract managers within 24 months after 1771 establishment of the training and certification requirements by 1772 the Department of Management Services and the Department of 1773 Financial Services. 1774 Section 57.âSubsection (5) of section 282.201, Florida 1775 Statutes, is amended to read: 1776 282.201âState data center.âThe state data center is 1777 established within the department. The provision of data center 1778 services must comply with applicable state and federal laws, 1779 regulations, and policies, including all applicable security, 1780 privacy, and auditing requirements. The department shall appoint 1781 a director of the state data center who has experience in 1782 leading data center facilities and has expertise in cloud 1783 computing management. 1784 (5)âNORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER CONTRACT.âIn order for 1785 the department to carry out its duties and responsibilities 1786 relating to the state data center, the secretary of the 1787 department shall contract by July 1, 2022, with the Northwest 1788 Regional Data Center pursuant to s. 287.057(10) s. 287.057(11). 1789 The contract shall provide that the Northwest Regional Data 1790 Center will manage the operations of the state data center and 1791 provide data center services to state agencies. 1792 (a)âThe department shall provide contract oversight, 1793 including, but not limited to, reviewing invoices provided by 1794 the Northwest Regional Data Center for services provided to 1795 state agency customers. 1796 (b)âThe department shall approve or request updates to 1797 invoices within 10 business days after receipt. If the 1798 department does not respond to the Northwest Regional Data 1799 Center, the invoice will be approved by default. The Northwest 1800 Regional Data Center must submit approved invoices directly to 1801 state agency customers. 1802 Section 58.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 1803 282.709, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1804 282.709âState agency law enforcement radio system and 1805 interoperability network.â 1806 (3)âIn recognition of the critical nature of the statewide 1807 law enforcement radio communications system, the Legislature 1808 finds that there is an immediate danger to the public health, 1809 safety, and welfare, and that it is in the best interest of the 1810 state to continue partnering with the systemâs current operator. 1811 The Legislature finds that continuity of coverage is critical to 1812 supporting law enforcement, first responders, and other public 1813 safety users. The potential for a loss in coverage or a lack of 1814 interoperability between users requires emergency action and is 1815 a serious concern for officersâ safety and their ability to 1816 communicate and respond to various disasters and events. 1817 (a)âThe department, pursuant to s. 287.057(10) s. 1818 287.057(11), shall enter into a 15-year contract with the entity 1819 that was operating the statewide radio communications system on 1820 January 1, 2021. The contract must include: 1821 1.âThe purchase of radios; 1822 2.âThe upgrade to the Project 25 communications standard; 1823 3.âIncreased system capacity and enhanced coverage for 1824 system users; 1825 4.âOperations, maintenance, and support at a fixed annual 1826 rate; 1827 5.âThe conveyance of communications towers to the 1828 department; and 1829 6.âThe assignment of communications tower leases to the 1830 department. 1831 Section 59.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 1832 286.101, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1833 286.101âForeign gifts and contracts.â 1834 (3) 1835 (b)âDisclosure under this subsection is not required with 1836 respect to: 1837 1.âA proposal to sell commodities through the online 1838 procurement program established pursuant to s. 287.057(20) s. 1839 287.057(22); 1840 2.âA proposal to sell commodities to a university pursuant 1841 to Board of Governors Regulation 18.001; 1842 3.âAn application or proposal from an entity that discloses 1843 foreign gifts or grants under subsection (2) or s. 1010.25; 1844 4.âAn application or proposal from a foreign source that, 1845 if granted or accepted, would be disclosed under subsection (2) 1846 or s. 1010.25; or 1847 5.âAn application or proposal from a public or not-for 1848 profit research institution with respect to research funded by 1849 any federal agency. 1850 Section 60.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 1851 287.0571, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1852 287.0571âBusiness case to outsource; applicability.â 1853 (3)âThis section does not apply to: 1854 (a)âA procurement of commodities and contractual services 1855 listed in s. 287.057(3)(d) and (e) and (21) (23). 1856 Section 61.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 1857 288.0001, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1858 288.0001âEconomic Development Programs Evaluation.âThe 1859 Office of Economic and Demographic Research and the Office of 1860 Program Policy Analysis and Government Accountability (OPPAGA) 1861 shall develop and present to the Governor, the President of the 1862 Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the 1863 chairs of the legislative appropriations committees the Economic 1864 Development Programs Evaluation. 1865 (2)âThe Office of Economic and Demographic Research and 1866 OPPAGA shall provide a detailed analysis of economic development 1867 programs as provided in the following schedule: 1868 (b)âBy January 1, 2015, and every 3 years thereafter, an 1869 analysis of: 1870 1.âThe entertainment industry sales tax exemption program 1871 established under s. 288.1258. 1872 2.âVISIT Florida and its programs established or funded 1873 under ss. 288.122-288.12265 and 288.124. 1874 3.âThe Florida Sports Foundation and related programs, 1875 including those established under ss. 288.1162, 288.11621, and 1876 288.1166, and 288.1167. 1877 Section 62.âSubsection (2) of section 288.706, Florida 1878 Statutes, is amended to read: 1879 288.706âFlorida Minority Business Loan Mobilization 1880 Program.â 1881 (2)âThe Florida Minority Business Loan Mobilization Program 1882 is created to promote the development of minority business 1883 enterprises, as defined in s. 288.703(3), increase the ability 1884 of minority business enterprises to compete for state contracts, 1885 and sustain the economic growth of minority business enterprises 1886 in this state. The goal of the program is to assist minority 1887 business enterprises by facilitating working capital loans to 1888 minority business enterprises that are vendors on state agency 1889 contracts. The Department of Management Services shall 1890 administer the program. 1891 Section 63.âSubsection (4) of section 290.004, Florida 1892 Statutes, is amended to read: 1893 290.004âDefinitions relating to Florida Enterprise Zone 1894 Act.âAs used in ss. 290.001-290.016: 1895 (4)ââMinority business enterpriseâ has the same meaning as 1896 provided in s. 288.703. 1897 Section 64.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 1898 295.187, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1899 295.187âFlorida Veteran Business Enterprise Opportunity 1900 Act.â 1901 (4)âVENDOR PREFERENCE.â 1902 (b)âNotwithstanding s. 287.057(12), If a veteran business 1903 enterprise entitled to the vendor preference under this section 1904 and one or more businesses entitled to this preference or 1905 another vendor preference provided by law submit bids, 1906 proposals, or replies for procurement of commodities or 1907 contractual services which are equal with respect to all 1908 relevant considerations, including price, quality, and service, 1909 the state agency must shall award the procurement or contract to 1910 the business having the smallest net worth. 1911 Section 65.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 1912 337.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1913 337.11âContracting authority of department; bids; emergency 1914 repairs, supplemental agreements, and change orders; combined 1915 design and construction contracts; progress payments; records; 1916 requirements of vehicle registration.â 1917 (4) 1918 (d)âNotwithstanding the requirements of ss. 120.57(3)(c) 1919 and 287.057(23) ss. 120.57(3)(c) and 287.057(25), upon receipt 1920 of a formal written protest that is timely filed, the department 1921 may continue the process provided in this subsection but may not 1922 take final agency action as to the lowest bidder except as part 1923 of the departmentâs final agency action in the protest or upon 1924 dismissal of the protest by the protesting party. 1925 Section 66.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 1926 339.63, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1927 339.63âSystem facilities designated; additions and 1928 deletions.â 1929 (5) 1930 (b)âA facility designated part of the Strategic Intermodal 1931 System pursuant to paragraph (a) which that is within the 1932 jurisdiction of a local government that maintains a 1933 transportation concurrency system must shall receive a waiver of 1934 transportation concurrency requirements applicable to Strategic 1935 Intermodal System facilities in order to accommodate any 1936 development at the facility which occurs pursuant to a building 1937 permit issued on or before December 31, 2017, but only if such 1938 facility is located: 1939 1.âWithin an area designated pursuant to s. 288.0656(7) as 1940 a rural area of opportunity; 1941 2.âWithin a rural enterprise zone as defined in s. 290.004 1942 s. 290.004(5); or 1943 3.âWithin 15 miles of the boundary of a rural area of 1944 opportunity or a rural enterprise zone. 1945 Section 67.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 1946 376.3072, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1947 376.3072âFlorida Petroleum Liability and Restoration 1948 Insurance Program.â 1949 (2)(a)âAn owner or operator of a petroleum storage system 1950 may become an insured in the restoration insurance program at a 1951 facility if: 1952 1.âA site at which an incident has occurred is eligible for 1953 restoration if the insured is a participant in the third-party 1954 liability insurance program or otherwise meets applicable 1955 financial responsibility requirements. After July 1, 1993, the 1956 insured must also provide the required excess insurance coverage 1957 or self-insurance for restoration to achieve the financial 1958 responsibility requirements of 40 C.F.R. s. 280.97, subpart H, 1959 not covered by paragraph (d). 1960 2.âA site which had a discharge reported before January 1, 1961 1989, for which notice was given pursuant to s. 376.3071(10) and 1962 which is ineligible for the third-party liability insurance 1963 program solely due to that discharge is eligible for 1964 participation in the restoration program for an incident 1965 occurring on or after January 1, 1989, pursuant to subsection 1966 (3). Restoration funding for an eligible contaminated site will 1967 be provided without participation in the third-party liability 1968 insurance program until the site is restored as required by the 1969 department or until the department determines that the site does 1970 not require restoration. 1971 3.âNotwithstanding paragraph (b), a site where an 1972 application is filed with the department before January 1, 1995, 1973 where the owner is a small business under s. 288.703 s. 1974 288.703(6), a Florida College System institution with less than 1975 2,500 FTE, a religious institution as defined by s. 1976 212.08(7)(m), a charitable institution as defined by s. 1977 212.08(7)(p), or a county or municipality with a population of 1978 less than 50,000, is eligible for up to $400,000 of eligible 1979 restoration costs, less a deductible of $10,000 for small 1980 businesses, eligible Florida College System institutions, and 1981 religious or charitable institutions, and $30,000 for eligible 1982 counties and municipalities, if: 1983 a.âExcept as provided in sub-subparagraph e., the facility 1984 was in compliance with department rules at the time of the 1985 discharge. 1986 b.âThe owner or operator has, upon discovery of a 1987 discharge, promptly reported the discharge to the department, 1988 and drained and removed the system from service, if necessary. 1989 c.âThe owner or operator has not intentionally caused or 1990 concealed a discharge or disabled leak detection equipment. 1991 d.âThe owner or operator proceeds to complete initial 1992 remedial action as specified in department rules. 1993 e.âThe owner or operator, if required and if it has not 1994 already done so, applies for third-party liability coverage for 1995 the facility within 30 days after receipt of an eligibility 1996 order issued by the department pursuant to this subparagraph. 1997 1998 However, the department may consider in-kind services from 1999 eligible counties and municipalities in lieu of the $30,000 2000 deductible. The cost of conducting initial remedial action as 2001 defined by department rules is an eligible restoration cost 2002 pursuant to this subparagraph. 2003 4.a.âBy January 1, 1997, facilities at sites with existing 2004 contamination must have methods of release detection to be 2005 eligible for restoration insurance coverage for new discharges 2006 subject to department rules for secondary containment. Annual 2007 storage system testing, in conjunction with inventory control, 2008 shall be considered to be a method of release detection until 2009 the later of December 22, 1998, or 10 years after the date of 2010 installation or the last upgrade. Other methods of release 2011 detection for storage tanks which meet such requirement are: 2012 (I)âInterstitial monitoring of tank and integral piping 2013 secondary containment systems; 2014 (II)âAutomatic tank gauging systems; or 2015 (III)âA statistical inventory reconciliation system with a 2016 tank test every 3 years. 2017 b.âFor pressurized integral piping systems, the owner or 2018 operator must use: 2019 (I)âAn automatic in-line leak detector with flow 2020 restriction meeting the requirements of department rules used in 2021 conjunction with an annual tightness or pressure test; or 2022 (II)âAn automatic in-line leak detector with electronic 2023 flow shut-off meeting the requirements of department rules. 2024 c.âFor suction integral piping systems, the owner or 2025 operator must use: 2026 (I)âA single check valve installed directly below the 2027 suction pump if there are no other valves between the dispenser 2028 and the tank; or 2029 (II)âAn annual tightness test or other approved test. 2030 d.âOwners of facilities with existing contamination that 2031 install internal release detection systems pursuant to sub 2032 subparagraph a. shall permanently close their external 2033 groundwater and vapor monitoring wells pursuant to department 2034 rules by December 31, 1998. Upon installation of the internal 2035 release detection system, such wells must be secured and taken 2036 out of service until permanent closure. 2037 e.âFacilities with vapor levels of contamination meeting 2038 the requirements of or below the concentrations specified in the 2039 performance standards for release detection methods specified in 2040 department rules may continue to use vapor monitoring wells for 2041 release detection. 2042 f.âThe department may approve other methods of release 2043 detection for storage tanks and integral piping which have at 2044 least the same capability to detect a new release as the methods 2045 specified in this subparagraph. 2046 2047 Sites meeting the criteria of this subsection for which a site 2048 rehabilitation completion order was issued before June 1, 2008, 2049 do not qualify for the 2008 increase in site rehabilitation 2050 funding assistance and are bound by the pre-June 1, 2008, 2051 limits. Sites meeting the criteria of this subsection for which 2052 a site rehabilitation completion order was not issued before 2053 June 1, 2008, regardless of whether they have previously 2054 transitioned to nonstate-funded cleanup status, may continue 2055 state-funded cleanup pursuant to s. 376.3071(6) until a site 2056 rehabilitation completion order is issued or the increased site 2057 rehabilitation funding assistance limit is reached, whichever 2058 occurs first. 2059 Section 68.âParagraph (b) of subsection (8) of section 2060 381.986, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2061 381.986âMedical use of marijuana.â 2062 (8)âMEDICAL MARIJUANA TREATMENT CENTERS.â 2063 (b)âAn applicant for licensure as a medical marijuana 2064 treatment center must apply to the department on a form 2065 prescribed by the department and adopted in rule. The department 2066 shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 2067 establishing a procedure for the issuance and biennial renewal 2068 of licenses, including initial application and biennial renewal 2069 fees sufficient to cover the costs of implementing and 2070 administering this section, and establishing supplemental 2071 licensure fees for payment beginning May 1, 2018, sufficient to 2072 cover the costs of administering ss. 381.989 and 1004.4351. The 2073 department shall identify applicants with strong diversity plans 2074 reflecting the this stateâs commitment to diversity and 2075 implement training programs and other educational programs to 2076 enable minority persons and minority business enterprises, as 2077 defined in s. 288.703, and veteran business enterprises, as 2078 defined in s. 295.187, to compete for medical marijuana 2079 treatment center licensure and contracts. Subject to the 2080 requirements in subparagraphs (a)2.-4., the department must 2081 shall issue a license to an applicant if the applicant meets the 2082 requirements of this section and pays the initial application 2083 fee. The department must shall renew the licensure of a medical 2084 marijuana treatment center biennially if the licensee meets the 2085 requirements of this section and pays the biennial renewal fee. 2086 However, the department may not renew the license of a medical 2087 marijuana treatment center that has not begun to cultivate, 2088 process, and dispense marijuana by the date that the medical 2089 marijuana treatment center is required to renew its license. An 2090 individual may not be an applicant, an owner, an officer, a 2091 board member, or a manager on more than one application for 2092 licensure as a medical marijuana treatment center. An individual 2093 or entity may not be awarded more than one license as a medical 2094 marijuana treatment center. An applicant for licensure as a 2095 medical marijuana treatment center must demonstrate: 2096 1.âThat, for the 5 consecutive years before submitting the 2097 application, the applicant has been registered to do business in 2098 this state. 2099 2.âPossession of a valid certificate of registration issued 2100 by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant 2101 to s. 581.131. 2102 3.âThe technical and technological ability to cultivate and 2103 produce marijuana, including, but not limited to, low-THC 2104 cannabis. 2105 4.âThe ability to secure the premises, resources, and 2106 personnel necessary to operate as a medical marijuana treatment 2107 center. 2108 5.âThe ability to maintain accountability of all raw 2109 materials, finished products, and any byproducts to prevent 2110 diversion or unlawful access to or possession of these 2111 substances. 2112 6.âAn infrastructure reasonably located to dispense 2113 marijuana to registered qualified patients statewide or 2114 regionally as determined by the department. 2115 7.âThe financial ability to maintain operations for the 2116 duration of the 2-year approval cycle, including the provision 2117 of certified financial statements to the department. 2118 a.âUpon approval, the applicant must post a $5 million 2119 performance bond issued by an authorized surety insurance 2120 company rated in one of the three highest rating categories by a 2121 nationally recognized rating service. However, a medical 2122 marijuana treatment center serving at least 1,000 qualified 2123 patients is only required to maintain a $2 million performance 2124 bond. 2125 b.âIn lieu of the performance bond required under sub 2126 subparagraph a., the applicant may provide an irrevocable letter 2127 of credit payable to the department or provide cash to the 2128 department. If provided with cash under this sub-subparagraph, 2129 the department must deposit the cash in the Grants and Donations 2130 Trust Fund within the Department of Health, subject to the same 2131 conditions as the bond regarding requirements for the applicant 2132 to forfeit ownership of the funds. If the funds deposited under 2133 this sub-subparagraph generate interest, the amount of that 2134 interest must be used by the department for the administration 2135 of this section. 2136 8.âThat all owners and managers have passed a background 2137 screening pursuant to subsection (9). As used in this 2138 subparagraph, the term: 2139 a.ââManagerâ means any person with the authority to 2140 exercise or contribute to the operational control, direction, or 2141 management of an applicant or a medical marijuana treatment 2142 center or who has authority to supervise any employee of an 2143 applicant or a medical marijuana treatment center. The term 2144 includes an individual with the power or authority to direct or 2145 influence the direction or operation of an applicant or a 2146 medical marijuana treatment center through board membership, an 2147 agreement, or a contract. 2148 b.ââOwnerâ means any person who owns or controls a 5 2149 percent or greater share of interests of the applicant or a 2150 medical marijuana treatment center which include beneficial or 2151 voting rights to interests. In the event that one person owns a 2152 beneficial right to interests and another person holds the 2153 voting rights with respect to such interests, then in such case, 2154 both are considered the owner of such interests. 2155 9.âThe employment of a medical director to supervise the 2156 activities of the medical marijuana treatment center. 2157 10.âA diversity plan that promotes and ensures the 2158 involvement of minority persons and minority business 2159 enterprises, as defined in s. 288.703, or veteran business 2160 enterprises, as defined in s. 295.187, in ownership, management, 2161 and employment. An applicant for licensure renewal must show the 2162 effectiveness of the diversity plan by including the following 2163 with his or her application for renewal: 2164 a.âRepresentation of minority persons and veterans in the 2165 medical marijuana treatment centerâs workforce; 2166 b.âEfforts to recruit minority persons and veterans for 2167 employment; and 2168 c.âA record of contracts for services with minority 2169 business enterprises and veteran business enterprises. 2170 Section 69.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 2171 394.47865, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2172 394.47865âSouth Florida State Hospital; privatization.â 2173 (1)âThe Department of Children and Families shall, through 2174 a request for proposals, privatize South Florida State Hospital. 2175 The department shall plan to begin implementation of this 2176 privatization initiative by July 1, 1998. 2177 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 287.057(12) s. 287.057(14), the 2178 department may enter into agreements, not to exceed 20 years, 2179 with a private provider, a coalition of providers, or another 2180 agency to finance, design, and construct a treatment facility 2181 having up to 350 beds and to operate all aspects of daily 2182 operations within the facility. The department may subcontract 2183 any or all components of this procurement to a statutorily 2184 established state governmental entity that has successfully 2185 contracted with private companies for designing, financing, 2186 acquiring, leasing, constructing, and operating major privatized 2187 state facilities. 2188 Section 70.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) and subsection 2189 (3) of section 402.7305, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2190 402.7305âDepartment of Children and Families; procurement 2191 of contractual services; contract management.â 2192 (2)âPROCUREMENT OF COMMODITIES AND CONTRACTUAL SERVICES.â 2193 (b)âWhen it is in the best interest of a defined segment of 2194 its consumer population, the department may competitively 2195 procure and contract for systems of treatment or service that 2196 involve multiple providers, rather than procuring and 2197 contracting for treatment or services separately from each 2198 participating provider. The department must ensure that all 2199 providers that participate in the treatment or service system 2200 meet all applicable statutory, regulatory, service quality, and 2201 cost control requirements. If other governmental entities or 2202 units of special purpose government contribute matching funds to 2203 the support of a given system of treatment or service, the 2204 department shall formally request information from those funding 2205 entities in the procurement process and may take the information 2206 received into account in the selection process. If a local 2207 government contributes matching funds to support the system of 2208 treatment or contracted service and if the match constitutes at 2209 least 25 percent of the value of the contract, the department 2210 shall afford the governmental match contributor an opportunity 2211 to name an employee as one of the persons required by s. 2212 287.057(15) s. 287.057(17) to evaluate or negotiate certain 2213 contracts, unless the department sets forth in writing the 2214 reason why the inclusion would be contrary to the best interest 2215 of the state. Any employee so named by the governmental match 2216 contributor shall qualify as one of the persons required by s. 2217 287.057(15) s. 287.057(17). A governmental entity or unit of 2218 special purpose government may not name an employee as one of 2219 the persons required by s. 287.057(15) s. 287.057(17) if it, or 2220 any of its political subdivisions, executive agencies, or 2221 special districts, intends to compete for the contract to be 2222 awarded. The governmental funding entity or contributor of 2223 matching funds must comply with all procurement procedures set 2224 forth in s. 287.057 when appropriate and required. 2225 (3)âCONTRACT MANAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS AND PROCESS.âThe 2226 Department of Children and Families shall review the time period 2227 for which the department executes contracts and shall execute 2228 multiyear contracts to make the most efficient use of the 2229 resources devoted to contract processing and execution. Whenever 2230 the department chooses not to use a multiyear contract, a 2231 justification for that decision must be contained in the 2232 contract. Notwithstanding s. 287.057(13) s. 287.057(15), the 2233 department is responsible for establishing a contract management 2234 process that requires a member of the departmentâs Senior 2235 Management or Selected Exempt Service to assign in writing the 2236 responsibility of a contract to a contract manager. The 2237 department shall maintain a set of procedures describing its 2238 contract management process which must minimally include the 2239 following requirements: 2240 (a)âThe contract manager shall maintain the official 2241 contract file throughout the duration of the contract and for a 2242 period not less than 6 years after the termination of the 2243 contract. 2244 (b)âThe contract manager shall review all invoices for 2245 compliance with the criteria and payment schedule provided for 2246 in the contract and shall approve payment of all invoices before 2247 their transmission to the Department of Financial Services for 2248 payment. 2249 (c)âThe contract manager shall maintain a schedule of 2250 payments and total amounts disbursed and shall periodically 2251 reconcile the records with the stateâs official accounting 2252 records. 2253 (d)âFor contracts involving the provision of direct client 2254 services, the contract manager shall periodically visit the 2255 physical location where the services are delivered and speak 2256 directly to clients receiving the services and the staff 2257 responsible for delivering the services. 2258 (e)âThe contract manager shall meet at least once a month 2259 directly with the contractorâs representative and maintain 2260 records of such meetings. 2261 (f)âThe contract manager shall periodically document any 2262 differences between the required performance measures and the 2263 actual performance measures. If a contractor fails to meet and 2264 comply with the performance measures established in the 2265 contract, the department may allow a reasonable period for the 2266 contractor to correct performance deficiencies. If performance 2267 deficiencies are not resolved to the satisfaction of the 2268 department within the prescribed time, and if no extenuating 2269 circumstances can be documented by the contractor to the 2270 departmentâs satisfaction, the department must terminate the 2271 contract. The department may not enter into a new contract with 2272 that same contractor for the services for which the contract was 2273 previously terminated for a period of at least 24 months after 2274 the date of termination. The contract manager shall obtain and 2275 enforce corrective action plans, if appropriate, and maintain 2276 records regarding the completion or failure to complete 2277 corrective action items. 2278 (g)âThe contract manager shall document any contract 2279 modifications, which shall include recording any contract 2280 amendments as provided for in this section. 2281 (h)âThe contract manager shall be properly trained before 2282 being assigned responsibility for any contract. 2283 Section 71.âSubsection (2) of section 408.045, Florida 2284 Statutes, is amended to read: 2285 408.045âCertificate of need; competitive sealed proposals.â 2286 (2)âThe agency shall make a decision regarding the issuance 2287 of the certificate of need in accordance with s. 287.057(15) the 2288 provisions of s. 287.057(17), rules adopted by the agency 2289 relating to intermediate care facilities for the developmentally 2290 disabled, and the criteria in s. 408.035, as further defined by 2291 rule. 2292 Section 72.âParagraph (a) of subsection (20) of section 2293 409.910, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2294 409.910âResponsibility for payments on behalf of Medicaid 2295 eligible persons when other parties are liable.â 2296 (20)(a)âEntities providing health insurance as defined in 2297 s. 624.603, health maintenance organizations and prepaid health 2298 clinics as defined in chapter 641, and, on behalf of their 2299 clients, third-party administrators, pharmacy benefits managers, 2300 and any other third parties, as defined in s. 409.901 s. 2301 409.901(27), which are legally responsible for payment of a 2302 claim for a health care item or service as a condition of doing 2303 business in the state or providing coverage to residents of this 2304 state, shall provide such records and information as are 2305 necessary to accomplish the purpose of this section, unless such 2306 requirement results in an unreasonable burden. 2307 Section 73.âSubsection (42) of section 570.07, Florida 2308 Statutes, is amended to read: 2309 570.07âDepartment of Agriculture and Consumer Services; 2310 functions, powers, and duties.âThe department shall have and 2311 exercise the following functions, powers, and duties: 2312 (42)âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 287.057(22) which 2313 s. 287.057(24) that require all agencies to use the online 2314 procurement system developed by the Department of Management 2315 Services, the department may continue to use its own online 2316 system. However, vendors using utilizing such system must shall 2317 be prequalified as meeting mandatory requirements and 2318 qualifications and must shall remit fees pursuant to s. 2319 287.057(22) s. 287.057(24), and any rules implementing s. 2320 287.057. 2321 Section 74.âParagraph (e) of subsection (6) of section 2322 627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2323 627.351âInsurance risk apportionment plans.â 2324 (6)âCITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.â 2325 (e)âThe corporation is subject to s. 287.057 for the 2326 purchase of commodities and contractual services except as 2327 otherwise provided in this paragraph. Services provided by 2328 tradepersons or technical experts to assist a licensed adjuster 2329 in the evaluation of individual claims are not subject to the 2330 procurement requirements of this section. Additionally, the 2331 procurement of financial services providers and underwriters 2332 must be made pursuant to s. 627.3513. Contracts for goods or 2333 services valued at or more than $100,000 are subject to approval 2334 by the board. 2335 1.âThe corporation is an agency for purposes of s. 287.057, 2336 except that, for purposes of s. 287.057(22) s. 287.057(24), the 2337 corporation is an eligible user. 2338 a.âThe authority of the Department of Management Services 2339 and the Chief Financial Officer under s. 287.057 extends to the 2340 corporation as if the corporation were an agency. 2341 b.âThe executive director of the corporation is the agency 2342 head under s. 287.057. The executive director of the corporation 2343 may assign or appoint a designee to act on his or her behalf. 2344 2.âThe corporation must provide notice of a decision or 2345 intended decision concerning a solicitation, contract award, or 2346 exceptional purchase by electronic posting. Such notice must 2347 contain the following statement: âFailure to file a protest 2348 within the time prescribed in this section constitutes a waiver 2349 of proceedings.â 2350 a.âA person adversely affected by the corporationâs 2351 decision or intended decision to award a contract pursuant to s. 2352 287.057(1) or (3)(c) who elects to challenge the decision must 2353 file a written notice of protest with the executive director of 2354 the corporation within 72 hours after the corporation posts a 2355 notice of its decision or intended decision. For a protest of 2356 the terms, conditions, and specifications contained in a 2357 solicitation, including provisions governing the methods for 2358 ranking bids, proposals, replies, awarding contracts, reserving 2359 rights of further negotiation, or modifying or amending any 2360 contract, the notice of protest must be filed in writing within 2361 72 hours after posting the solicitation. Saturdays, Sundays, and 2362 state holidays are excluded in the computation of the 72-hour 2363 time period. 2364 b.âA formal written protest must be filed within 10 days 2365 after the date the notice of protest is filed. The formal 2366 written protest must state with particularity the facts and law 2367 upon which the protest is based. Upon receipt of a formal 2368 written protest that has been timely filed, the corporation must 2369 stop the solicitation or contract award process until the 2370 subject of the protest is resolved by final board action unless 2371 the executive director sets forth in writing particular facts 2372 and circumstances that require the continuance of the 2373 solicitation or contract award process without delay in order to 2374 avoid an immediate and serious danger to the public health, 2375 safety, or welfare. 2376 (I)âThe corporation must provide an opportunity to resolve 2377 the protest by mutual agreement between the parties within 7 2378 business days after receipt of the formal written protest. 2379 (II)âIf the subject of a protest is not resolved by mutual 2380 agreement within 7 business days, the corporationâs board must 2381 transmit the protest to the Division of Administrative Hearings 2382 and contract with the division to conduct a hearing to determine 2383 the merits of the protest and to issue a recommended order. The 2384 contract must provide for the corporation to reimburse the 2385 division for any costs incurred by the division for court 2386 reporters, transcript preparation, travel, facility rental, and 2387 other customary hearing costs in the manner set forth in s. 2388 120.65(9). The division has jurisdiction to determine the facts 2389 and law concerning the protest and to issue a recommended order. 2390 The divisionâs rules and procedures apply to these proceedings. 2391 The protest must be heard by the division at a publicly noticed 2392 meeting in accordance with procedures established by the 2393 division. 2394 c.âIn a protest of an invitation-to-bid or request-for 2395 proposals procurement, submissions made after the bid or 2396 proposal opening which amend or supplement the bid or proposal 2397 may not be considered. In protesting an invitation-to-negotiate 2398 procurement, submissions made after the corporation announces 2399 its intent to award a contract, reject all replies, or withdraw 2400 the solicitation that amends or supplements the reply may not be 2401 considered. Unless otherwise provided by law, the burden of 2402 proof rests with the party protesting the corporationâs action. 2403 In a competitive-procurement protest, other than a rejection of 2404 all bids, proposals, or replies, the administrative law judge 2405 must conduct a de novo proceeding to determine whether the 2406 corporationâs proposed action is contrary to the corporationâs 2407 governing statutes, the corporationâs rules or policies, or the 2408 solicitation specifications. The standard of proof for the 2409 proceeding is whether the corporationâs action was clearly 2410 erroneous, contrary to competition, arbitrary, or capricious. In 2411 any bid-protest proceeding contesting an intended corporation 2412 action to reject all bids, proposals, or replies, the standard 2413 of review by the board is whether the corporationâs intended 2414 action is illegal, arbitrary, dishonest, or fraudulent. 2415 d.âFailure to file a notice of protest or failure to file a 2416 formal written protest constitutes a waiver of proceedings. 2417 3.âThe agency head or his or her designee shall consider 2418 the recommended order of an administrative law judge and take 2419 final action on the protest. Any further legal remedy lies with 2420 the First District Court of Appeal. 2421 Section 75.âParagraph (k) of subsection (1) of section 2422 1001.216, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2423 1001.216âCouncil on the Social Status of Black Men and 2424 Boys.â 2425 (1)âThe Council on the Social Status of Black Men and Boys 2426 is established within Florida Memorial University and shall be 2427 composed of 19 members appointed as follows: 2428 (k)âA businessperson who is an African American, as defined 2429 in s. 760.80(2)(a), appointed by the Governor. 2430 Section 76.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 2431 1007.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2432 1007.27âArticulated acceleration mechanisms.â 2433 (1) 2434 (b)âThe State Board of Education and the Board of Governors 2435 shall identify Florida College System institutions, state 2436 universities, and national consortia to develop courses that 2437 align with s. 1007.25 for students in secondary education and 2438 provide the training required under s. 1007.35(6). 2439 Section 77.âSubsection (1) of section 1008.23, Florida 2440 Statutes, is amended to read: 2441 1008.23âConfidentiality of assessment instruments.â 2442 (1)âAll examination and assessment instruments, including 2443 developmental materials and workpapers directly related thereto, 2444 which are prepared, prescribed, or administered pursuant to ss. 2445 1002.69, 1003.52, 1003.56, 1007.25, 1007.35, 1008.22, 1008.25, 2446 and 1012.56 shall be confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 2447 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. Provisions 2448 governing access, maintenance, and destruction of such 2449 instruments and related materials shall be prescribed by rules 2450 of the State Board of Education. 2451 Section 78.âSubsection (1) of section 1008.24, Florida 2452 Statutes, is amended to read: 2453 1008.24âTest administration and security; public records 2454 exemption.â 2455 (1)âA person may not knowingly and willfully violate test 2456 security rules adopted by the State Board of Education for 2457 mandatory tests administered by or through the State Board of 2458 Education or the Commissioner of Education to students, 2459 educators, or applicants for certification or administered by 2460 school districts pursuant to ss. 1002.69, 1003.52, 1003.56, 2461 1007.25, 1007.35, 1008.22, 1008.25, and 1012.56, or, with 2462 respect to any such test, knowingly and willfully to: 2463 (a)âGive examinees access to test questions prior to 2464 testing; 2465 (b)âCopy, reproduce, or use in any manner inconsistent with 2466 test security rules all or any portion of any secure test 2467 booklet; 2468 (c)âCoach examinees during testing or alter or interfere 2469 with examineesâ responses in any way; 2470 (d)âMake answer keys available to examinees; 2471 (e)âFail to follow security rules for distribution and 2472 return of secure test as directed, or fail to account for all 2473 secure test materials before, during, and after testing; 2474 (f)âFail to follow test administration directions specified 2475 in the test administration manuals; or 2476 (g)âParticipate in, direct, aid, counsel, assist in, or 2477 encourage any of the acts prohibited in this section. 2478 Section 79.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2479 made by this act to section 110.112, Florida Statutes, in a 2480 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 311.07, Florida 2481 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2482 311.07âFlorida seaport transportation and economic 2483 development funding.â 2484 (4)âAny port which receives funding under the program shall 2485 institute procedures to ensure that jobs created as a result of 2486 the state funding shall be subject to equal opportunity hiring 2487 practices in the manner provided in s. 110.112. 2488 Section 80.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.